hr-HR: Jezična verzija: AAR – afar; AFR – afrikaans; AKA – akan; AMH – amharski; ARA – arapski; ARA-EG – arapski (Egipat); ARA-GUL – arapski (Perzijski zaljev); ARA-IQ – arapski (Irak); ARA-LEV – arapski (Levant); ARA-MAG – arapski (Magreb); ARA-SUD – arapski (Sudan); ASM – asamski; AYM – ajmarski; AZE – azerbejdžanski; BEL – bjeloruski; BEN – bengalski; BOD – tibetanski; BOS – bosanski; BRA – brazilski portugalski; BRE – bretonski; BUL – bugarski; CAT – katalonski; CES – češki; CRO – hrvatski; CYM – velški; DAN – danski; DEU – njemački; DEU-BE – njemački (Belgija); DEU-CH – njemački (Švicarska); ELL – grčki; ENG – engleski; ENG-AU – engleski (Australija); ENG-CA – engleski (Kanada); ENG-GB – engleski (Ujedinjeno Kraljevstvo); ENG-HK – engleski (Hong Kong); ENG-IN – engleski (Indija); ENG-NZ – engleski (Novi Zeland); ENG-SG – engleski (Singapur); ENG-US – engleski (Sjedinjene Države); ENG-ZA – engleski (Južnoafrička Republika); EPO – esperanto; EST – estonski; EUS – baskijski; EWE – ewe; FAO – farski; FAS – farsi; FAS – perzijski; FIL – filipinski; FIN – finski; FRA – francuski; FRA-BE – francuski (Belgija); FRA-CA – francuski (Kanada); FRA-CH – francuski (Švicarska); GLE – irski; GLG – galicijski; GRC – starogrčki; GRN – guarani; GSW – švicarski njemački; GUJ – gujarati; HAU – hausa; HEB – hebrejski; HIN – hindski; HRV – hrvatski; HUN – mađarski; HYE – armenski; IBO – igbo; INC – indonezijski; IND – indonezijski; IRA – iranski; ISL – islandski; ITA – talijanski; JAV – javanski; JPN – japanski; KAL – grenlandski; KAN – kannada; KAT – gruzijski; KAZ – kazaški; KHM – kmerski; KIN – kinjaruanda; KIR – kirgiski; KOR – korejski; KUR – kurdski; LAO – laoski; LAT – latinski; LAV – latvijski; LIN – lingala; LIT – litavski; LTZ – luksemburški; MAL – malajalamski; MAR – maratski; MDR – mandar; MKD – makedonski; MLG – malgaški; MLT – malteški; MON – mongolski; MRI – maorski; MSA – malajski; MYA – burmanski; Višejezično – višejezično (nije specifično za određeni jezik); NAV – navajo; NEP – nepalski; NLD – nizozemski; NLD-BE – nizozemski (Belgija); NNO – norveški (nynorsk); NOB – norveški (bokmål); NOR – norveški; NYA – chichewa; ORM – oromo; PAN – pandžapski; POL – poljski; POR – portugalski; POR-BR – portugalski (Brazil); PUS – paštunski; QUE – kečuanski; ROH – retoromanski; RON – rumunjski; RUS – ruski; SCR – hrvatski; SLK – slovački; SLV – slovenski; SME – sjeverni laponski; SMO – samoanski; SOM – somalijski; SOT – južni soto; SPA – španjolski; SPA-LATAM – španjolski (Latinska Amerika); SPA-MX – španjolski (Meksiko); SQI – albanski; SRP – srpski; SUN – sundanski; SWA – svahili; SWE – švedski; TAM – tamilski; TEL – teluški; TGK – tadžički; TGL – tagalog; THA – tajski; TON – tonganski; TUK – turkmenski; TUR – turski; UIG – ujgurski; UKR – ukrajinski; URD – urdski; UZB – uzbečki; VIE – vijetnamski; WOL – volof; XHO – xhosa; YID – jidiš; YOR – joruba; ZHO (simpl) – kineski (pojednostavljeni); ZHO (tr) – kineski (tradicionalni); ZUL – zulu; Ostalo
fi: Kieliversio: AAR- afar; AFR- afrikaans; AKA- akan; AMH- amhara; ARA- arabia; ARA-EG- arabia (Egypti); ARA-GUL- arabia (persianlahti); ARA-IQ- arabia (Irak); ARA-LEV- arabia (levanttilainen); ARA-MAG- arabia (Maghreb); ARA-SUD- arabia (Sudan); ASM- assami; AYM- aimara; AZE- azeri; BEL- valkovenäjä; BEN- bengali; TIB- tiibet; BOS- bosnia; BRA- Brasilian portugali; BRE - bretoni; BUL- bulgaria; CAT- katalaani; CZE- tšekki; CRO- kroatia; CYM- kymri; DAN- tanska; DEU- saksa; DEU-BE- saksa (Belgia); DEU-CH- saksa (Sveitsi); ELL- kreikka; ENG- englanti; ENG-AU - englanti (Australia); ENG-CA - englanti (Kanada); ENG-GB - englanti (Iso-Britannia); ENG-HK- englanti (Hongkong); ENG-IN- englanti (Intia); ENG-NZ- englanti (Uusi-Seelanti); ENG-SG- englanti (Singapore); ENG-US- englanti (Yhdysvallat); ENG-ZA - englanti (Etelä-Afrikka); EPO- esperanto; EST- viro; BAQ- baski; EWE- ewe; FAO- fääri; FAS- farsi; PER- persia; PHI- filipino; FIN- suomi; FRE- ranska; FRE-BE- ranska (Belgia); FRA-CA- ranska (Kanada); FRE-CH- ranska (Sveitsi); GLE- gaeli; GLG- galicia; GRC- muinaiskreikka; GRN- guarani; GSW- Sveitsin saksa; GUJ- gujarati; HAU- hausa; HEB- heprea; HIN - hindi; CRO- kroatia; HUN- unkari; HYE- armenia; IBO- igbo; INC-indonesia; IND- indonesia; IRA-iran; ISL- islanti; ITA- italia; JAV- jaava; JPN- japani; KAL- grönlanti; KAN- kannada; GEO- georgia; KAZ- kazakki; KHM- khmer; KIN- ruanda; KIR- kirgiisi; KOR- korea; KUR- kurdi; LAO- lao; LAT- latina; LAV- latvia; LIN- lingala; LIT- liettua; LTZ- luxemburg; MAL- malaiji; MAR- marathi; MDR- mandar; MKD- makedonia; MLG- malagasi; MLT- malta; MON- mongolia; MRI- maori; MSA- malaiji; MYA- burma; Multilingual- monikielinen (ei yhtä määritettyä kieltä); NAV- navajo; NEP- nepali; NLD- hollanti; NLD-BE- hollanti (Belgia); NNO- norja (uusnorja); NOB- norja (kirjanorja); NOR- norja; NYA- chichewa; ORM- oromo; PAN- punjabi; POL- puola; POR- portugali; POR-BRA- portugali (Brasilia); PUS- paštu; QUE- ketšua; ROH- retoromaani; RUM- romania; RUS- venäjä; SCR- kroatia; SLK- slovakki; SLV- slovenia; SME- pohjoissaame; SMO- samoa; SOM- somali; SOT- eteläsotho; ESP- espanja; SPA-LATAM- espanja (Latinalainen Amerikka); ESP-MX- espanja (Meksiko); ALB- albania; SRP- serbia; SUN- sundani; SWA- swahili; SWE- ruotsi; TAM- tamili; TEL- telugu; TGK- tadžikki; TGL- tagalog; THA- thai; TON- tonga; TUK- turkmeeni; TUR- turkki; UIG- uiguuri; UKR- ukraina; URD- urdu; UZB- uzbekki; VIE- vietnam; WOL- wolof; XHO- xhosa; YID- jiddiš; YOR- joruba; CHI (simpl)- yksinkertainen kiina; CHI (tr)- perinteinen kiina; ZUL- zulu; Muu
vi: Phiên bản ngôn ngữ: AAR- Tiếng Afar; AFR- Tiếng Afrikaans; AKA- Tiếng Akan; AMH- Tiếng Amhara; ARA- Tiếng Ả Rập; ARA-EG- Tiếng Ả Rập (Ai Cập); ARA-GUL- Tiếng Ả Rập (Vùng Vịnh); ARA-IQ- Tiếng Ả Rập (Iraq); ARA-LEV- Tiếng Ả Rập (Levantine); ARA-MAG- Tiếng Ả Rập (Maghrebi); ARA-SUD- Tiếng Ả Rập (Sudan); ASM- Tiếng Assam; AYM- Tiếng Aymara; AZE- Tiếng Azerbaijan; BEL- Tiếng Belarus; BEN- Tiếng Bengali; BOD- Tiếng Tây Tạng; BOS- Tiếng Bosnia; BRA- Tiếng Bồ Đào Nha Brasil; BRE- Tiếng Breton; BUL- Tiếng Bungari; CAT- Tiếng Catalan; CZE- Tiếng Séc; CRO- Tiếng Croatia; CYM- Tiếng Wales; DAN- Tiếng Đan Mạch; DEU- Tiếng Đức; DEU-BE- Tiếng Đức (Bỉ); DEU-CH- Tiếng Đức (Thụy Sĩ); ELL- Tiếng Hy Lạp; ENG- Tiếng Anh; ENG-AU- Tiếng Anh (Úc); ENG-CA- Tiếng Anh (Canada); ENG-GB- Tiếng Anh (Vương quốc Anh); ENG-HK- Tiếng Anh (Hồng Kông); ENG-IN- Tiếng Anh (Ấn Độ); ENG-NZ- Tiếng Anh (New Zealand); ENG-SG- Tiếng Anh (Singapore); ENG-US- Tiếng Anh (Hoa Kỳ); ENG-ZA- Tiếng Anh (Nam Phi); EPO- Quốc tế ngữ; EST- Tiếng Estonia; EUS- Tiếng Basque; EWE- Tiếng Ewe; FAO- Tiếng Faroe; FAS- Tiếng Ba Tư; FAS- Tiếng Ba Tư; FIL- Tiếng Philippines; FIN- Tiếng Phần Lan; FRA- Tiếng Pháp; FRA-BE- Tiếng Pháp (Bỉ); FRA-CA- Tiếng Pháp (Canada); FRA-CH- Tiếng Pháp (Thụy Sĩ); GLE- Tiếng Ireland; GLG- Tiếng Galicia; GRC- Tiếng Hy Lạp cổ đại; GRN- Tiếng Guarani; GSW- Tiếng Đức Thụy Sĩ; GUJ- Tiếng Gujarati; HAU- Tiếng Hausa; HEB- Tiếng Do Thái; HIN- Tiếng Hindi; HRV- Tiếng Croatia; HUN- Tiếng Hungary; HYE- Tiếng Armenia; IBO- Tiếng Igbo; INC- Tiếng Indonesia; IND- Tiếng Indonesia; IRA- Tiếng Iran; ISL- Tiếng Iceland; ITA- Tiếng Ý; JAV- Tiếng Java; JPN- Tiếng Nhật; KAL- Tiếng Greenland; KAN- Tiếng Kannada; KAT- Tiếng George; KAZ- Tiếng Kazakh; KHM- Tiếng Khmer; KIN- Tiếng Kinyarwanda; KIR- Tiếng Kirghiz; KOR- Tiếng Hàn; KUR- Tiếng Kurd; LAO- Tiếng Lào; LAT- Tiếng Latin; LAV- Tiếng Latvia; LIN- Tiếng Lingala; LIT- Tiếng Litva; LTZ- Tiếng Luxembourg; MAL- Tiếng Malayalam; MAR- Tiếng Marathi; MDR- Tiếng Mandar; MKD- Tiếng Macedonia; MLG- Tiếng Malagasy; MLT- Tiếng Malta; MON- Tiếng Mông Cổ; MRI- Tiếng Maori; MSA- Tiếng Mã Lai; MYA- Tiếng Miến Điện; Multilingual- Đa ngôn ngữ (không dành riêng cho một ngôn ngữ); NAV- Tiếng Navajo; NEP- Tiếng Nepal; NLD- Tiếng Hà Lan; NLD-BE- Tiếng Hà Lan (Bỉ); NNO- Tiếng Na Uy (Nynorsk); NOB- Tiếng Na Uy (Bokmål); NOR- Tiếng Na Uy; NYA- Tiếng Chichewa; ORM- Tiếng Oromo; PAN- Tiếng Punjab; POL- Tiếng Ba Lan; POR- Tiếng Bồ Đào Nha; POR-BR- Tiếng Bồ Đào Nha (Brazil); PUS- Tiếng Pashto; QUE- Tiếng Quechua; ROH- Tiếng Romansh; RON- Tiếng Rumani; RUM- Tiếng Nga; SCR- Tiếng Croatia; SLK- Tiếng Slovak; SLV- Tiếng Slovenia; SME- Tiếng Bắc Sami; SMO- Tiếng Samoa; SOM- Tiếng Somali; SOT- Tiếng Nam Sotho; SPA- Tiếng Tây Ban Nha; SPA-LATAM- Tiếng Tây Ban Nha (Châu Mỹ La-tinh); SPA-MX- Tiếng Tây Ban Nha (Mexico); SQI- Tiếng Albania; SRP- Tiếng Serbia; SUN- Tiếng Sunda; SWA- Tiếng Swahili; SWE- Tiếng Thụy Điển; TAM- Tiếng Tamil; TEL- Tiếng Telugu; TGK- Tiếng Tajik; TGL- Tiếng Tagalog; THA- Tiếng Thái; TON- Tiếng Tonga; TUK- Tiếng Turkmen; TUR- Tiếng Thổ Nhĩ Kỳ; UIG- Tiếng Uyghur; UKR- Tiếng Ukraina; URD- Tiếng Urdu; UZB- Tiếng Uzbek; VIE- Tiếng Việt; WOL- Tiếng Wolof; XHO- Tiếng Xhosa; YID- Tiếng Yiddish; YOR- Tiếng Yoruba; ZHO (giản thể)- Tiếng Trung (giản thể); ZHO (phồn thể)- Tiếng Trung (phồn thể); ZUL- Tiếng Zulu; Khác
pt-BR: Versão do idioma: AAR- Afar; AFR - Africânder; AKA- Akan; AMH- Amárico; ARA-Árabe; ARA-EG- Árabe (Egito); ARA-GUL- Árabe (Golfo); ARA-IQ- Árabe (Iraque); ARA-LEV- Árabe (levantino); ARA-MAG- Árabe (magrebino); ARA-SUD- Árabe (sudanês); ASM- Assamês; AYM- Aymara; AZE- Azeri; BEL- Bielorrusso; BEN- Bengali; BOD- Tibetano; BOS- Bósnio; BRA- Português Brasileiro; BRE- Bretão; BUL- Búlgaro; CAT- Catalão; CZE- Tcheco; CRO- Croata; CYM- Galês; DAN- Dinamarquês; DEU- Alemão; DEU-BE- Alemão (Bélgica); DEU-CH- Alemão (Suíça); GRE- Grego; ENG- Inglês; ENG-AU- Inglês (Austrália); ENG-CA- Inglês (Canadá); ENG-GB- Inglês (Reino Unido); ENG-HK- Inglês (Hong Kong); ENG-IN- Inglês (Índia); ENG-NZ- Inglês (Nova Zelândia); ENG-SG- Inglês (Singapura); ENG-US- Inglês (Estados Unidos); ENG-ZA- Inglês (África do Sul); EPO- Esperanto; EST- Estoniano; EUS- Basco; EWE- Jeje; FAO- Ilhas Faroé; FAS- Farsi; FAS- Persa; FIL- Filipino; FIN- Finlandês; FRA- Francês; FRA-BE- Francês (Bélgica); FRA-CA- Francês (Canadá); FRA-CH- Francês (Suíça); GLE- Irlandês; GLG- Galego; GRC- Grego antigo; GRN- Guarani; GSW - Alemão Suíço; GUJ- Gujarati; HAU- Hauçá; HEB- Hebraico; HIN- Hindi; HRV - Croata; HUN- Húngaro; ARM- Armênio; IBO- Igbo; INC- Indonésio; IND- Indonésio; IRA – Iraniano; ISL- Islandês; ITA- Italiano; JAV- Javanês; JPN - Japonês; KAL- Groenlandês; KAN- Canarês; KAT- Georgiano; KAZ- Cazaque; KHM- Quemer; KIN- Kinyarwanda; KIR- Quirguistão; KOR- Coreano; KUR- Curdo; LAO- Lao; Lat- Latim; LAV - Letão; LIN- Lingala; LIT- Lituano; LTZ- Luxemburguês; MAL - Malaiala; MAR- Marati; MDR - Mandar; MKD- Macedônio; MLG- Malgaxe; MLT- Maltês; MON- Mongol; MRI- Maori; MSA- Malaio; MYA- Birmanês; Multilíngue- multilíngue (não específico para um idioma); NAV- Navajo; NEP - Nepalês; DUT- Holandês; DUT-BE- Holandês (Bélgica); NNO - Norueguês (Nynorsk); NOB - Norueguês (Bokmål); NOR- Norueguês; NYA- Chichewa; ORM - Oromo; PAN- Punjabi; POL- Polonês; POR- Português; POR-BRA- Português (Brasil); PUS- Pastó; QUE- Quíchua; ROH - Romanche; RUM- Romeno; RUS- Russo; SCR- Croata; SLK- Eslovaco; SLV - Esloveno; SME- Sámi do Norte; SMO- Samoano; SOM- Somali; SOT - Sesoto; SPA- Espanhol; SPA-LATAM- Espanhol (América Latina); SPA-MX- Espanhol (México); ALB-Albanês; SRP- Sérvio; SUN- Sudanês; SWA- Swahili; SWE- Sueco; TAM- Tâmil; TEL-Télugo; TGK- Tadjique; TGL- Tagalo; THA- Tailandês; TON- Tonganês; TUK - Turcomeno; TUR- Turco; UIG- Uigur; UKR- Ucraniano; URD- Urdu; UZB- Uzbeque; VIE-Vietnamita; WOL - Uolofe; XHO- Xhosa; YID - Iídiche; YOR- Iorubá; CHI (simples)- Chinês (simplificado); CHI (tr)- Chinês (tradicional); ZUL- Zulu; Outro
de: Sprachversion: AAR - Afar; AFR – Afrikaans; AKA – Akan; AMH – Amharisch; ARA – Arabisch; ARA-EG- Arabisch (Ägypten); ARA-GUL- Arabisch (Golf); ARA-IQ – Arabisch (Irak); ARA-LEV- Arabisch (Levantinisch); ARA-MAG- Arabisch (Maghrebinisch); ARA-SUD- Arabisch (Sudanesisch); ASM - Assamesisch; AYM – Aymara; AZE- Aserbaidschanisch; BEL- Weißrussisch; BEN – Bengalisch; BOD - Tibetisch; BOS- Bosnisch; BRA – Portugiesisch (Brasilien); BRE – Bretonisch; BUL – Bulgarisch; CAT – Katalanisch; CES – Tschechisch; CRO – Kroatisch; CYM – Walisisch; DAN – Dänisch; DEU – Deutsch; DEU-BE – Deutsch (Belgien); DEU-CH – Deutsch (Schweiz); ELL - Griechisch; ENG – Englisch; ENG-AU – Englisch (Australien); ENG-CA – Englisch (Kanada); ENG-GB – Englisch (Vereinigtes Königreich); ENG-HK – Englisch (Hongkong); ENG-IN – Englisch (Indien); ENG-NZ – Englisch (Neuseeland); ENG-SG – Englisch (Singapur); ENG-US – Englisch (USA); ENG-ZA – Englisch (Südafrika); EPA – Esperanto; EST – Estnisch; EUS- Baskisch; EWE – Ewe; FAO - Färöisch; FAS – Farsi; FAS- Persisch; FIL – Philippinisch; FIN – Finnisch; FRA – Französisch; FRA-BE – Französisch (Belgien); FRA-CA – Französisch (Kanada); FRA-CH – Französisch (Schweiz); GLE – Irisch; GLG – Galizisch; GRC – Altgriechisch; GRN – Guarani; GSW – Schweizerdeutsch; GUJ – Gujarati; HAU – Hausa; HEB – Hebräisch; HIN – Hindi; HRV – Kroatisch; HUN – Ungarisch; HYE – Armenisch; IBO – Igbo; INC – Indonesisch; IND – Indonesisch; IRA – Iranisch; ISL – Isländisch; ITA – Italienisch; JAV – Javanisch; JPN – Japanisch; KAL – Grönländisch; KAN – Kannada; KAT – Georgisch; KAZ – Kasachisch; KHM – Khmer; KIN – Kinyarwanda; KIR – Kirgisisch; KOR – Koreanisch; KUR – Kurdisch; LAO – Lao; LAT – Latein; LAV – Lettisch; LIN – Lingala; LIT – Litauisch; LTZ – Luxemburgisch; MAL – Malayalam; MAR – Marathi; MDR – Mandar; MKD – Mazedonisch; MLG - Madagassisch; MLT – Maltesisch; MON – Mongolisch; MRI – Maori; MSA – Malaiisch; MYA – Burmesisch; Multilingual – mehrsprachig (nicht sprachspezifisch); NAV – Navajo; NEP – Nepali; NLD – Niederländisch; NLD-BE – Niederländisch (Belgien); NNO – Norwegisch (Nynorsk); NOB – Norwegisch (Bokmål); NOR – Norwegisch; NYA – Chichewa; ORM – Oromo; PAN – Punjabi; POL – Polnisch; POR – Portugiesisch; POR-BRA – Portugiesisch (Brasilien); PUS – Paschtu; QUE – Quechua; ROH – Rätoromanisch; RON – Rumänisch; RUS – Russisch; SCR – Kroatisch; SLK – Slowakisch; SLV – Slowenisch; SME – Nordsamisch; SMO – Samoanisch; SOM – Somali; SOT – Süd-Sotho; SPA – Spanisch; SPA-LATAM – Spanisch (Lateinamerika); SPA-MX – Spanisch (Mexiko); SQI – Albanisch; SRP – Serbisch; SUN – Sundanesisch; SWA – Suaheli; SWE – Schwedisch; TAM – Tamil; TEL – Telugu; TGK – Tadschikisch; TGL – Tagalog; THA – Thailändisch; TON – Tonganisch; TUK – Turkmenisch; TUR – Türkisch; UIG – Uigurisch; UKR – Ukrainisch; URD – Urdu; UZB – Usbekisch; VIE – Vietnamesisch; WOL – Wolof; XHO – Xhosa; YID – Jiddisch; YOR – Yoruba; ZHO (simpl) – Chinesisch (vereinfacht); ZHO (tr) – Chinesisch (traditionell); ZUL – Zulu; Sonstiges
tr: Dil Sürümü: AAR- Afarca; AFR- Afrikaanca; AKA- Akan dili; AMH- Habeşistan dili; ARA- Arapça; ARA-EG- Arapça (Mısır); ARA-GUL- Arapça (Körfez); ARA-IQ- Arapça (Irak); ARA-LEV- Arapça (Levant); ARA-MAG- Arapça (Mağrip); ARA-SUD- Arapça (Sudan); ASM- Assamese dili; AYM- Aymaraca; AZE- Azerice; BEL- Belarusça; BEN- Bengal dili; BOD- Tibet dili; BOS- Boşnakça; BRA- Brezilya Portekizcesi; BRE- Bretonca; BUL- Bulgarca; CAT- Katalanca; CES- Çekçe; CRO- Hırvatça; CYM- Galce; DAN- Danca; DEU- Almanca; DEU-BE- Almanca (Belçika); DEU-CH- Almanca (İsviçre); ELL- Yunanca; ENG- İngilizce; ENG-AU- İngilizce (Avustralya); ENG-CA- İngilizce (Kanada); ENG-GB- İngilizce (Birleşik Krallık); ENG-HK-İngilizce (Hong Kong); ENG-IN- İngilizce (Hindistan); ENG-NZ- İngilizce (Yeni Zelanda); ENG-SG- İngilizce (Singapur); ENG-US- İngilizce (Amerika Birleşik Devletleri); ENG-ZA- İngilizce (Güney Afrika); EPO- Esperanto; EST- Estonca; EUS- Bask dili; EWE- Ewece; FAO- Faroe dili; FAS- Farsça; FAS- Farsça; FIL- Filipince; FIN- Fince; FRA- Fransızca; FRA-BE- Fransızca (Belçika); FRA-CA- Fransızca (Kanada); FRA-CH- Fransızca (İsviçre); GLE- İrlandaca; GLG- Galiçyaca; GRC- Antik Yunanca; GRN- Guarani dili; GSW- İsviçre Almancası; GUJ- Gujarati dili; HAU- Hausa dili; HEB- İbranice; HIN- Hintçe; HRV- Hırvatça; HUN- Macar; HYE- Ermenice; IBO- Igbo dili; INC- Endonezce; IND- Endonezce; IRA- Acem; ISL- İzlandaca; ITA- İtalyanca; JAV- Cavaca; JPN- Japonca; KAL- Grönlandca; KAN- Kannada dili; KAT- Gürcüce; KAZ- Kazakça; KHM- Kmer dili; KIN- Kinyarwanda dili; KIR- Kırgızca; KOR- Korece; KUR- Kürtçe; LAO- Laoca; LAT- Latince; LAV- Letonca; LIN- Lingala dili; LIT- Litvanyaca; LTZ- Lüksemburgca; MAL- Malayalam dili; MAR- Marathi dili; MDR- Mandar; MKD- Makedonca; MLG-Malagaşça; MLT-Malta dili; MON- Moğolca; MRI- Maori dili; MSA- Malayca; MYA- Birmanca; Multilingual - çok dilli (tek bir dile özgü değil); NAV- Navajo dili; NEP- Nepalce; NLD- Felemenkçe; NLD-BE- Felemenkçe (Belçika); NNO- Norveççe (Nynorsk); NOB- Norveççe (Bokmål); NOR- Norveççe; NYA- Çiçeva dili; ORM- Oromo dili; PAN- Pencapça; POL- Lehçe; POR- Portekizce; POR-BR- Portekizce (Brezilya); PUS- Peştuca; QUE- Keçuva dili; ROH- Romanşça; RON- Rumence; RUS- Rusça; SCR- Hırvatça; SLK- Slovakça; SLV- Slovence; SME- Kuzey Sámi dili; SMO- Samoaca; SOM- Somalice; SOT- Güney Sotho dili; SPA- İspanyolca; SPA-LATAM- İspanyolca (Latin Amerika); SPA-MX- İspanyolca (Meksika); SQI- Arnavutça; SRP- Sırpça; SUN- Sudan dili; SWA- Savahilice; SWE- İsveççe; TAM- Tamilce; TEL- Telugu dili; TGK- Tacikçe; TGL- Tagalogca; THA- Tay dili; TON- Tongaca; TUK- Türkmence; TUR- Türkçe; UIG- Uygurca; UKR- Ukraynaca; URD- Urduca; UZB- Özbekçe; VIE- Vietnamca; WOL- Wolof; XHO- Xhosa dili; YID- Yahudi Almancası; YOR- Yoruba dili; ZHO (simpl)- Çince (basitleştirilmiş); ZHO (tr)- Çince (geleneksel); ZUL- Zulu dili; Diğer
da: Sprogversion: AAR- afar; AFR- Afrikaans; AKA- akan; AMH- amharisk; ARA- Arabisk; ARA-EG- arabisk (Egypten); ARA-GUL- arabisk (Golf); ARA-IQ- arabisk (Irak); ARA-LEV- arabisk (levantinsk); ARA-MAG- arabisk (Maghrebi); ARA-SUD- arabisk (sudanesisk); ASM- assamisk; AYM- aymara; AZE- aserbajdsjansk; BEL- hviderussisk; BEN- bengali; BOD- tibetansk; BOS- bosnisk; BRA- Brasiliansk portugisisk; BRE- bretonsk; BUL- Bulgarsk; CAT- Catalansk; CES- tjekkisk; CRO- Kroatisk; CYM- walisisk; DAN- Dansk; DEU- Tysk; DEU-BE- Tysk (Belgien); DEU-CH- Tysk (Schweiz); ELL- græsk; ENG- Engelsk; ENG-AU- engelsk (Australien); ENG-CA- engelsk (Canada); ENG-GB- engelsk (Storbritannien); ENG-HK- engelsk (Hongkong); ENG-IN- Engelsk (Indien); ENG-NZ- engelsk (New Zealand); ENG-SG- Engelsk (Singapore); ENG-US- Engelsk (USA); ENG-ZA- engelsk (Sydafrika); EPO- Esperanto; EST- Estisk; EUS- baskisk; EWE- Ewe; FAO- færøsk; FAS- Farsi; PER- persisk; FIL- filipinsk; FIN- Finsk; FRE- fransk; FRE-BE- fransk (Belgien); FRA-CA- fransk (Canada); FRE-CH- fransk (Schweiz); GLE- irsk; GLG- Galicisk; GRC - oldgræsk; GRN- guarani; GSW- Schweizisk tysk; GUJ- gujarati; HAU- hausa; HEB- Hebraisk; HIN- Hindi; HRV- Kroatisk; HUN- Ungarsk; HYE- armensk; IBO- igbo; INC- Indonesisk; IND- Indonesisk; IRA- Iransk; ISL- islandsk; ITA- Italiensk; JAV- javanesisk; JPN- Japansk; KAL- grønlandsk; KAN- kannada; KAT- georgisk; KAZ- Kasakhisk; KHM- khmer; KIN- kinyarwanda; KIR- Kirgisisk; KOR- Koreansk; KUR- Kurdisk; LAO- lao; LAT- Latin; LAV- Lettisk; LIN- lingala; LIT- Litauisk; LTZ- luxembourgsk; MAL- malaysisk; MAR- marathi; MDR- Mandar; MKD- makedonsk; MLG- malagassisk; MLT- maltesisk; MON- Mongolsk; MRI- maori; MSA- malajisk; MYA- burmesisk; Multilingual- Flersproget (ikke specifik for ét sprog); NAV- navajo; NEP- Nepalesisk; NLD- nederlandsk; NLD-BE- nederlandsk (Belgien); NNO- norsk (nynorsk); NOB- norsk (bokmål); NOR- Norsk; NYA- chichewa; ORM- oromo; PAN- punjabi; POL- Polsk; POR- Portugisisk; POR-BRA- portugisisk (Brasilien); PUS- pashto; QUE- quechua; ROH- Romansk; RON- rumænsk; RUS- Russisk; SCR- Kroatisk; SLK- Slovakisk; SLV- Slovensk; SME- nordsamisk; SMO- samoansk; SOM- somali; SOT- sydsotho; SPA - spansk; SPA-LATAM- spansk (latinamerikansk); SPA-MX- spansk (Mexico); SQI- albansk; SRP- Serbisk; SUN- sundanesisk; SWA- swahili; SWE- Svensk; TAM- tamil; TEL- telugu; TGK- tajik; TGL- Tagalog; THA- Thai; TON- tongansk; TUK- turkmensk; TUR- Tyrkisk; UIG- uyghur; UKR- Ukrainsk; URD- urdu; UZB- usbekisk; VIE- Vietnamesisk; WOL- wolof; XHO- xhosa; YID- jiddisch; YOR- Yoruba; ZHO (simpl)- kinesisk (forenklet); ZHO (tr)- kinesisk (traditionelt); ZUL- zulu; Andet
it: Versione in lingua: AAR- afar; AFR- Afrikaans; AKA- Akan; AMH- amarico; ARA- Arabo; ARA-EG- Arabo (Egitto); ARA-GUL- Arabo (Golfo); ARA-IQ- Arabo (Iraq); ARA-LEV- Arabo (levantino); ARA-MAG- Arabic (Maghrebi); ARA-SUD- Arabo (sudanese); ASM- Assamese; AYM- Aymara; AZE- Azerbaijani; BEL- Bielorusso; BEN- Bengali; BOD- Tibetan; BOS- Bosnian; BRA- Portoghese brasiliano; BRE- Breton; BUL- Bulgaro; CAT- Catalano; CES- Ceco; CRO- Croato; CYM- Gallese; DAN- Danese; DEU- Tedesco; DEU-BE- Tedesco (Belgio); DEU-CH- Tedesco (Svizzera); ELL- Greco; ENG- Inglese; ENG-AU- Inglese (Australia); ENG-CA- Inglese (Canada); ENG-GB- Inglese (Regno Unito); ENG-HK- Inglese (Hong Kong); ENG-IN- Inglese (India); ENG-NZ- Inglese (Nuova Zelanda); ENG-SG- Inglese (Singapore); ENG-US- Inglese (Stati Uniti); ENG-ZA- Inglese (Sudafrica); EPO- Esperanto; EST- Estone; EUS-Basco; EWE- Ewe; FAO- Faroese; FAS- Farsi; FAS- Persiano; FIL- Filipino; FIN- Finlandese; FRA- Francese; FRE-BE- Francese (Belgio); FRA-CA- Francese (Canada); FRE-CH- Francese (Svizzera); GLE- Irlandese; GLG- Galiziano; GRC- Greco antico; GRN- Guarani; GSW- Svizzero tedesco; GUJ- Gujarati; HAU- Hausa; HEB- Ebraico; HIN- Hindi; HRV- Croato; HUN- Ungherese; HYE- Armeno; IBO- Igbo; INC- Indonesiano; IND- Indonesiano; IRA- Iraniano; ISL- Islandese; ITA- Italiano; JAV- Javanese; JPN- Giapponese; KAL- Groenlandese; KAN- Kannada; KAT- Georgiano; KAZ- Kazako; KHM- Khmer; KIN- Kinyarwanda; KIR- Kirghiso; KOR- Coreano; KUR- Curdo; LAO- Lao; LAT- Latino; LAV- Lettone; LIN- Lingala; LIT- Lituano; LTZ- Lussemburghese; MAL- Malayalam; MAR- Marathi; MDR- Mandar; MKD- Macedonian; MLG- Malagasy; MLT- Maltese; MON- Mongolo; MRI- Maori; MSA- Malay; MYA- Birmano; Multilingue- Multilingue (non specifico per una lingua); NAV- Navajo; NEP- Nepalese; NLD- Dutch; DUT-BE- Olandese (Belgio); NNO- Norvegese (Nynorsk); NOB- Norwegian (Bokmål); NOR- Norvegese; NYA- Chichewa; ORM- Oromo; PAN- Punjabi; POL- Polacco; POR- Portoghese; POR-BR- Portoghese (Brasile); PUS- Pashto; QUE- Quechua; ROH- Romancio; RON- Rumeno; RUS- Russo; SCR- Croato; SLK- Slovacco; SLV- Sloveno; SME- Sami del Nord; SMO- Samoan; SOM- Somali; SOT- Sotho del Sud; ESP- Spagnolo; ESP-LATAM- Spagnolo (latinoamericano); ESP-MX- Spagnolo (Messico); SQI- Albanese; SRP- Serbo; SUN- Sundanese; SWA- Swahili; SWE- Svedese; TAM- Tamil; TEL- Telugu; TGK- Tajik; TGL- Tagalog; THA- Tailandese; TON- Tongan; TUK- Turkmen; TUR- Turco; UIG-Uiguro; UKR- Ucraino; URD- Urdu; UZB- Uzbek; VIE- Vietnamita; WOL- Wolof; XHO- Xhosa; YID- Yiddish; YOR- Yoruba; CHI (sem)- Cinese (semplificato); CHI (tr)- Cinese (tradizionale); ZUL- Zulu; Altro
el: Έκδοση γλώσσας: AAR- Αφάρ; AFR- Αφρικάανς; AKA- Ακάν; AMH- Αμαρικά; ARA- Αραβικά; ARA-EG- Αραβικά (Αίγυπτος); ARA-GUL- Αραβικά (Χώρες του Κόλπου); ARA-IQ- Αραβικά (Ιράκ); ARA-LEV- Αραβικά (Λεβάντε); ARA-MAG- Αραβικά (Μαγκρέμπ); ARA-SUD- Αραβικά (Σουδάν); ASM- Ασαμικά; AYM- Αϊμαρά; ΑΖΕ- Αζερικά; BEL- Λευκορωσικά; BEN- Μπενγκάλι; BOD- Θιβετιανά; BOS- Βοσνιακά; BRA- Πορτογαλικά Βραζιλίας; BRE- Βρετονικά; BUL- Βουλγαρικά; ΚΑΤ- Καταλανικά; CES- Τσεχικά; ΚΡΟ- Κροατικά; CYM- Ουαλικά; DAN- Δανικά; DEU- Γερμανικά; DEU-BE- Γερμανικά (Βέλγιο); DEU-CH- Γερμανικά (Ελβετία); ELL- Ελληνικά; ENG- Αγγλικά; ENG-AU- Αγγλικά (Αυστραλία); ENG-CA- Αγγλικά (Καναδάς); ENG-GB- Αγγλικά (Ηνωμένο Βασίλειο); ENG-HK- Αγγλικά (Χονγκ Κονγκ); ENG-IN- Αγγλικά (Ινδία); ENG-NZ- Αγγλικά (Νέα Ζηλανδία); ENG-SG- Αγγλικά (Σιγκαπούρη); ENG-US- Αγγλικά (Ηνωμένες Πολιτείες); ENG-ZA- Αγγλικά (Νότια Αφρική); EPO- Εσπεράντο; EST- Εσθονικά; EUS- Βασικά; EWE- Έβε; FAO- Φεροϊκά; FAS- Φαρσί; FAS- Περσικά; FIL- Φιλιππινέζικα; FIN- Φινλανδικά; FRA- Γαλλικά; FRA-BE- Γαλλικά (Βέλγιο); FRA-CA- Γαλλικά (Καναδάς); FRA-CH- Γαλλικά (Ελβετία); GLE- Ιρλανδικά; GLG- Γαλικιανά; GRC- Αρχαία Ελληνικά; GRN- Γκουαρανί; GSW- Ελβετικά Γερμανικά; GUJ- Γκουτζαράτι; HAU- Χάουσα; HEB- Εβραϊκά; HIN- Χίντι; HRV- Κροατικά; HUN- Ουγγρικά; HYE- Αρμενικά; IBO- Ίγκμπο; INC- Ινδονησιακά; IND- Ινδονησιακά; ΙΡΑ- Ιρανικά; ISL- Ισλανδικά; ITA- Ιταλικά; JAV- Ιαβανέζικα; JPN- Ιαπωνικά; KAL- Γροιλανδικά; KAN- Κανάντα; ΚΑΤ- Γεωργιανά; ΚΑΖ- Καζακικά; KHM- Χμερ; KIN- Κινιαρουάντα; KIR- Κιργιζικά; KOR- Κορεατικά; KUR- Κουρδικά; LAO- Λάο; LAT- Λατινικά; LAV- Λετονικά; LIN- Λινγκάλα; LIT- Λιθουανικά; LTZ- Λουξεμβουργιανά; MAL- Μαλαγιαλάμ; ΜΑΡ- Μαράθι; MDR- Μαντάρι; MKD- Βορειομακεδονικά; MLG- Μαλγασικά; MLT- Μαλτεζικά; ΜΟΝΟ- Μογγολικά; MRI- Μαορί; MSA- Μαλαισιανά; MYA- Βιρμανικά; Πολύγλωσσο- πολύγλωσσο (όχι ειδικά για μία γλώσσα); NAV- Ναβάχο; ΝΕΠ- Νεπαλικά; NLD- Ολλανδικά; NLD-BE- Ολλανδικά (Βέλγιο); NNO- Νορβηγικά (Nynorsk); NOB- Νορβηγικά (Bokmål); ΝΟΡ- Νορβηγικά; NYA- Τσιτσέουα; ORM- Ορόμο; PAN- Παντζάμπι; POL- Πολωνικά; POR- Πορτογαλικά; POR-BR- Πορτογαλικά (Βραζιλία); PUS- Πάστο; QUE- Κέτσουα; ROH- Ρομανσικά; RON- Ρουμανικά; RUS- Ρωσικά; SCR- Κροατικά; SLK- Σλοβακικά; SLV- Σλοβενικά; SME- Βόρεια Σαάμι; SMO- Σαμοανικά; SOM- Σομαλικά; SOT- Νότια Σόθο; SPA- Ισπανικά; SPA-LATAM- Ισπανικά (Λατινική Αμερική); SPA-MX- Ισπανικά (Μεξικό); SQI- Αλβανικά; SRP- Σερβικά; ΗΛΙΟΣ- Σουνδανικά; SWA- Σουαχίλι; SWE- Σουηδικά; TAM- Ταμίλ; TEL- Τελούγκου; TGK- Τατζικικά; TGL- Ταγκαλόγκ; THA- Ταϊλανδικά; TON- Τόνγκια; TUK- Τουρκμενικά; TUR- Τουρκικά; UIG- Ουιγούρ; UKR- Ουκρανικά; URD- Ούρντου; UZB- Ουζμπεκικά; VIE- Βιετναμέζικα; WOL- Γουόλοφ; XHO- Κόσα; YID- Γίντις; YOR- Γιορούμπα; ZHO (απλ)- Κινεζικά (απλοποιημένα); ZHO (παρ)- Κινεζικά (παραδοσιακά); ZUL- Ζουλού; Άλλο
bg-BG: Езикова версия: AAR - афарски; AFR - африкаанс; AKA - акански; AMH - амхарски; ARA - арабски; ARA-EG - арабски (Египет); ARA-GUL - арабски (Персийски залив); ARA-IQ - арабски (Ирак); ARA-LEV - арабски (левантински); ARA-MAG - арабски (магребски); ARA-SUD - арабски (судански); ASM - асамски; AYM - аймара; AZE - азербайджански; BEL - беларуски; BEN - бенгалски; BOD - тибетски; BOS - босненски; BRA - бразилски португалски; BRE - бретонски; BUL - български; CAT - каталонски; CES - чешки; CRO - хърватски; CYM - уелски; DAN - датски; DEU - немски; DEU-BE - немски (Белгия); DEU-CH - немски (Швейцария); ELL - гръцки; ENG - английски; ENG-AU - английски (Австралия); ENG-CA - английски (Канада); ENG-GB - английски (Обединеното кралство); ENG-HK - английски (Хонконг); ENG-IN - английски (Индия); ENG-NZ - английски (Нова Зеландия); ENG-SG - английски (Сингапур); ENG-US - английски (САЩ); ENG-ZA - английски (Южна Африка); EPO - есперанто; EST - естонски; EUS - баски; EWE - еве; ФАО - фарьорски; FAS - фарси; FAS - персийски; FIL - филипински; FIN - финландски; FRA - френски; FRA-BE - френски (Белгия); FRA-CA - френски (Канада); FRA-CH - Френски (Швейцария); GLE - ирландски; GLG - галисийски; GRC - старогръцки; GRN - гуарани; GSW - швейцарски немски; GUJ - гуджарати; HAU - хауса; HEB - иврит; HIN - хинди; HRV - хърватски; HUN - унгарски; HYE - арменски; IBO - игбо; INC - индонезийски; IND - индонезийски; IRA - ирански; ISL - исландски; ITA - италиански; JAV - явански; JPN - японски; KAL - гренландски; KAN - каннада; KAT - грузински; КАЗ - казахски; KHM - кхмерски; KIN - киняруанда; KIR - киргизски; KOR - корейски; KUR - кюрдски; LAO - лаоски; LAT - латински; LAV - латвийски; LIN - лингала; LIT - литовски; LTZ - люксембургски; MAL - малаялам; MAR - маратхи; MDR - мандар; MKD - македонски; MLG - мадагаскарски; MLT - малтийски; MON - монголски; MRI - маори; MSA - малайски; MYA - бирмански; Многоезичен - многоезичен (не само на един език); NAV - навахо; NEP - непалски; NLD - нидерландски; NLD-BE - нидерландски (Белгия); NNO - норвежки (нюнорск); NOB - норвежки (букмол); NOR - норвежки; NYA - нянджа; ORM - оромо; PAN - пенджаби; POL - полски; POR - португалски; POR-BR - португалски (Бразилия); PUS - пущунски; QUE - кечуа; ROH - романш; RON - румънски; РУС - руски; SCR - хърватски; SLK - словашки; SLV - словенски; SME - северносаамски; SMO - самоански; SOM - сомалийски; SOT - сото; SPA - испански; SPA-LATAM - испански (Латинска Америка); SPA-MX - испански (Мексико); SQI - албански; SRP - сръбски; SUN - сундански; SWA - суахили; SWE - шведски; TAM - тамилски; TEL - телугу; TGK - таджикски; TGL - тагалог; THA - тайландски; TON - тонгански; TUK - туркменски; TUR - турски; UIG - уйгурски; UKR - украински; URD - урду; UZB - узбекски; VIE - виетнамски; WOL - волоф; XHO - кхоса; YID - идиш; YOR - йоруба; ZHO (simpl) - китайски (опростен); ZHO (tr) - китайски (традиционен); ZUL- зулуски; Други
cs: Jazyková verze: AAR- afarština; AFR- afrikánština; AKA- akanština; AMH- amharština; ARA- arabština; ARA-EG- arabština (Egypt); ARA-GUL- arabština (záliv); ARA-IQ- arabština (Irák); ARA-LEV- arabština (Levanta); ARA-MAG- arabština (Magreb); ARA-SUD- arabština (Súdán); ASM- ásámština; AYM- ajmarština; AZE- ázerbájdžánština; BEL- běloruština; BEN- bengálština; BOD- tibetština; BOS- bosenština; BRA- brazilská portugalština; BRE- bretonština; BUL- bulharština; CAT- katalánština; CES- čeština; CRO- chorvatština; CYM- velština; DAN- dánština; DEU- němčina; DEU-BE- němčina (Belgie); DEU-CH- němčina (Švýcarsko); ELL- řečtina; ENG- angličtina; ENG-AU- angličtina (Austrálie); ENG-CA- angličtina (Kanada); ENG-GB- angličtina (Spojené království); ENG-HK- angličtina (Hong Kong); ENG-IN- angličtina (Indie); ENG-NZ- angličtina (Nový Zéland); ENG-SG- angličtina (Singapur); ENG-US- angličtina (Spojené státy); ENG-ZA- angličtina (Jižní Afrika); EPO- esperanto; EST- estonština; EUS- baskičtina; EWE- eweština; FAO- faerština; FAS- fársí; FAS- perština; FIL- filipínština; FIN- finština; FRA- francouzština; FRA-BE- francouzština (Belgie); FRA-CA- francouzština (Kanada); FRA-CH- francouzština (Švýcarsko); GLE- irština; GLG- galicijština; GRC- starořečtina; GRN- guaraní; GSW- švýcarská němčina; GUJ- gujarati; HAU- hausa; HEB- hebrejština; HIN- hindština; HRV- chorvatština; HUN- maďarština; HYE- arménština; IBO- igbo; INC- indonéština; IND- indonéština; IRA- íránština; ISL- islandština; ITA- italština; JAV- jávština; JPN- japonština; KAL- grónština; KAN- kannadština; KAT- gruzínština; KAZ- kazaština; KHM- khmerština; KIN- rwandština; KIR- kyrgyzština; KOR- korejština; KUR- kurdština; LAO- laoština; LAT- latina; LAV- lotyština; LIN- lingalština; LIT- litevština; LTZ- lucemburština; MAL- malajálamština; MAR- maráthština; MDR- mandarština; MKD- makedonština; MLG- malgaština; MLT- maltština; MON- mongolština; MRI- maorština; MSA- malajština; MYA- barmština; Multilingual- vícejazyčné (není specifické pro jeden jazyk); NAV- navajo; NEP- nepálština; NLD- nizozemština; NLD-BE- nizozemština (Belgie); NNO- norština (Nynorsk); NOB- norština (bokmål); NOR- norština; NYA- chichewa; ORM- oromo; PAN- pandžábština; POL- polština; POR- portugalština; POR-BR- portugalština (Brazílie); PUS- paštština; QUE- kečuánština; ROH- rétorománština; RON- rumunština; RUS- ruština; SCR- chorvatština; SLK- slovenština; SLV- slovinština; SME- severní sámština; SMO- samojština; SOM- somálština; SOT- jižní sotština; SPA- španělština; SPA-LATAM- španělština (latinskoamerická); SPA-MX- španělština (Mexiko); SQI- albánština; SRP- srbština; SUN- sundánština; SWA- svahilština; SWE- švédština; TAM- tamilština; TEL- telugu; TGK- tádžičtina; TGL- tagalština; THA- thajština; TON- tongánština; TUK- turkmenština; TUR- turečtina; UIG- ujgurština; UKR- ukrajinština; URD- urdština; UZB- uzbečtina; VIE- vietnamština; WOL- wolofština; XHO- xhosa; YID- jidiš; YOR- joruba; ZHO (simpl)- čínština (zjednodušená); ZHO (tr)- čínština (tradiční); ZUL- zulu; Jiné
sl-SI: Jezikovna različica: AAR- Afar; AFR – afrikanščina; AKA – akanščina; AMH – amharščina; ARA – arabščina; ARA-EG – arabščina (Egipt); ARA-GUL – arabščina (Zaliv); ARA-IQ – arabščina (Irak); ARA-LEV – arabščina (levantska); ARA-MAG – arabščina (magrebska); ARA-SUD – arabščina (sudanska); ASM – asamščina; AYM – ajmarščina; AZE – azerbajdžanščina; BEL – beloruščina; BEN – bengalščina; BOD – tibetanščina; BOS – bosanščina; BRA – brazilska portugalščina; BRE – bretonščina; BUL – bolgarščina; CAT – katalonščina; CES – češčina; CRO – hrvaščina; CYM – valižanščina; DAN – danščina; DEU – namščina; DEU-BE – nemščina (Belgija); DEU-CH – nemščina (Švica); ELL – grščina; ENG – angleščina; ENG-AU – angleščina (Avstralija); ENG-CA – angleščina (Kanada); ENG-GB – angleščina (Združeno kraljestvo); ENG-HK – angleščina (Hong Kong); ENG-IN – angleščina (Indija); ENG-NZ – angleščina (Nova Zelandija); ENG-SG – angleščina (Singapur); ENG-US – angleščina (Združene države); ENG-ZA – angleščina (Južna Afrika); EPO – esperanto; EST – estonščina; EUS – baskovščina; EWE – evejščina; FAO – ferščina; FAS – perzijščina; FAS – perzijščina; FIL – filipinščina; FIN – finščina; FRA – francoščina; FRA-BE – francoščina (Belgija); FRA-CA – francoščina (Kanada); FRA-CH – francoščina (Švica); GLE – irščina; GLG – galicijščina; GRC – starogrščina; GRN – gvaranščina; GSW – švicarska nemščina; GUJ – gudžaratščina; HAU – havščina; HEB – hebrejščina; HIN – hindijščina; HRV – hrvaščina; HUN – madžarščina; HYE – armenščina; IBO – igbo; INC – indonezijščina; IND – indonezijščina; IRA – iranščina; ISL – islandščina; ITA – italijanščina; JAV – javanščina; JPN – japonščina; KAL – Grenlandščina; KAN – kanareščina; KAT – gruzijščina; KAZ – kazahstanščina; KHM – kmerščina; KIN – ruandščina; KIR – kirgiščina; KOR – korejščina; KUR – kurdščina; LAO – laoščina; LAT – latinščina; LAV – latvijščina; LIN – lingala; LIT – litvanščina; LTZ – luksemburščina; MAL – malajalamščina; MAR – maratščina; MDR – mandarinščina; MKD – makedonščina; MLG – malgaščina; MLT – malteščina; MON – mongolščina; MRI – maorščina; MSA – malajščina; MYA – burmanščina; Večjezično – večjezično (ni specifično za en jezik); NAV – navajo; NEP – nepalščina; NLD – nizozemščina; NLD-BE – nizozemščina (Belgija); NNO – norveščina (novonorveščina); NOB – norveščina (Bokmål); NOR – norveščina; NYA – čičevščina; ORM – oromščina; PAN – pandžabščina; POL – poljščina; POR – portugalščina; POR-BR – portugalščina (Brazilija); PUS – paštunščina; QUE – kečuanščina; ROH – retoromanščina; RON – romunščina; RUS – ruščina; SCR – hrvaščina; SLK – slovaščina; SLV – slovenščina; SME – severna samščina; SMO – samoanščina; SOM – somalijščina; SOT – južni sotho; SPA – španščina; SPA-LATAM – španščina (latinskoameriška); SPA-MX – španščina (Mehika); SQI – albanščina; SRP – srbščina; SUN – sundščina; SWA – svahilščina; SWE – švedščina; TAM – tamilščina; TEL – telugu; TGK – tadžiščina; TGL – tagaloščina; THA – tajščina; TON – tongščina; TUK – turkmenščina; TUR – turščina; UIG – ujgurščina; UKR – ukrajinščina; URD – urdujščina; UZB – uzbeščina; VIE – vietnamščina; WOL- Wolof; XHO- Xhosa; YID – jidiš; YOR – jorubščina; ZHO (simpl) – kitajščina (poenostavljeno); ZHO (tr) – kitajščina (tradicionalna); ZUL- Zulu; Drugo
sk-SK: Jazyková verzia: AAR- Afarčina; AFR- Afrikánčina; AKA- Akančina; AMH- Amharčina; ARA- Arabčina; ARA-EG- Arabčina (Egypt); ARA-GUL- Arabčina (Perzský záliv); ARA-IQ- Arabčina (Irak); ARA-LEV- Arabčina (Levantínčina); ARA-MAG- Arabčina (Maghrebi); ARA-SUD- Arabčina (sudánska); ASM- Assamčina; AYM- Aymarčina; AZE- Azerbajdžančina; BEL- Bieloruština; BEN- Bengálčina; BOD- Tibetčin; BOS- Bosniančina; BRA- Brazílska portugalčina; BRE- Bretónčina; BUL- Bulharčina; CAT- Katalánčina; CES- Čeština; CRO- Chorvátčina; CYM- Waleština; DAN- Dánčina; DEU- Nemčina; DEU-BE- Nemčina (Belgicko); DEU-CH- Nemčina (Švajčiarsko); ELL- Gréčtina; ENG- Angličtina; ENG-AU- Angličtina (Austrália); ENG-CA- Angličtina (Kanada); ENG-GB- Angličtina (Spojené kráľovstvo); ENG-HK- Angličtina (Hong Kong); ENG-IN- Angličtina (India); ENG-NZ- Angličtina (Nový Zéland); ENG-SG- Angličtina (Singapur); ENG-US- Angličtina (Spojené štáty americké); ENG-ZA- Angličtina (Južná Afrika); EPO- Esperanto; EST- Estónčina; EUS- Baskičtina; EWE- Ewe; FAO – Faerčina; FAS- Farsi; FAS- Perzština; FIL- Filipínčina; FIN- Fínčina; FRA- Francúzština; FRA-BE- Francúzština (Belgicko); FRA-CA- Francúzština (Kanada); FRA-CH- Francúzština (Švajčiarsko); GLE- Írčina; GLG- Galícijčina; GRC - Starogréčtina; GRN- Guaraníjčina; GSW- Švajčiarska nemčina; GUJ- Gudžarátčina; HAU- Hauština; HEB- Hebrejčina; HIN- Hindčina; HRV- Chorvátčina; HUN- Maďarčina; HYE- Arménčina; IBO- Igbočina; INC – Indonézština; IND- Indonézština; IRA- Iránčina; ISL- Islandčina; ITA- Taliančina; JAV- Jávčina; JPN- Japončina; KAL- Grónčina; KAN- Kannadčina; KAT- Gruzínčina; KAZ- Kazaština; KHM- Khmérčina; KIN- Rwandčina; KIR- Kirgizština; KOR- Kórejčina; KUR- Kurdčina; LAO- Laoština; LAT- Latinčina; LAV- Lotyština; LIN- Lingalčina; LIT- Litovčina; LTZ- Luxemburčina; MAL- Malajálamčina; MAR- Maráthčina; MDR- Mandarčina; MKD- Macedónčina; MLG- Malgaština; MLT- Maltčina; MON- Mongolčina; MRI - Maorijčina; MSA – Malajčina; MYA- Barmčina; Viacjazyčné - viacjazyčné (nie je špecifické pre jeden jazyk); NAV- Navajo; NEP- Nepálčina; NLD- Holandčina; NLD-BE- Holandčina (Belgicko); NNO- Nórčina (Nynorsk); NOB – Nórčina (Bokmål); NOR- Nórčina; NYA- Čeva; ORM- Oromčina; PAN- Pandžábčina; POL- Poľština; POR- Portugalčina; POR-BR- Portugalčina (Brazília); PUS- Paštčina; QUE- Kečuánčina; ROH- Rétorománčina; RON- Rumunčina; RUS- Ruština; SCR- Chorvátčina; SLK- Slovenčina; SLV- Slovinčina; SME- Severná saamčina; SMO- Samojčina; SOM- Somálčina; SOT- Sothčina; SPA- Španielčina; SPA-LATAM- Španielčina (latinskoamerická); SPA-MX- Španielčina (Mexiko); SQI- Albánčina; SRP- Srbčina; SUN- Sundánčina; SWA- Svahilčina; SWE- Švédština; TAM- Tamilčina; TEL- Telugčina; TGK- Tadžičtina; TGL- Tagalčina; THA- Thajčina; TON- Tongčina; TUK- Turkménčina; TUR- Turečtina; UIG- Ujgurčina; UKR- Ukrajinčina; URD- Urdčina; UZB- Uzbečtina; VIE- Vietnamčina; WOL- Wolof; XHO- Xhoština; YID- Jidiš; YOR- Jorubčina; ZHO (zjednodušená) – Čínština (zjednodušená); ZHO (tr) – Čínština (tradičná); ZUL- Zulu; Iné
es: Versión de idioma: AAR: Afar; AFR- Afrikáans; AK: Akan; AMH: Amárico; ARA- Árabe; ARA-EG: Árabe (Egipto); ARA-GUL: Árabe (Golfo); ARA-IQ: Árabe (Irak); ARA-LEV: Árabe (Levantino); ARA-MAG: Árabe (magrebí); ARA-SUD: Árabe (sudanés); ASM: Asamés; AYM: Aymara; AZE: Azerí; BEL: Bielorruso; BEN: Bengalí; BOD: Tibetano; BOS: Bosnio; BRA- Portugués brasileño; BRE: Bretón; BUL- Búlgaro; CAT- Catalán; CES: Checo; CRO- Croata; CYM: Galés; DAN- Danés; DEU- Alemán; DEU-BE- Alemán (Bélgica); DEU-CH- Alemán (Suiza); GRE: Griego; ENG- Inglés; ENG-AU: Inglés (Australia); ENG-CA: Inglés (Canadá); ENG-GB: Inglés (Reino Unido); ENG-HK: Inglés (Hong Kong); ENG-IN- Inglés (India); ENG-NZ: Inglés (Nueva Zelanda); ENG-SG- Inglés (Singapur); ENG-US- Inglés (Estados Unidos); ENG-ZA: Inglés (Sudáfrica); EPO- Esperanto; EST- Estonio; BAQ: Vasco; EWE: Ewé; FAO: Feroés; FAS- Persa (Farsi); FAS: Persa; PHL: Filipino; FIN- Finlandés; FRA: Francés; FRA-BE: Francés (Bélgica); FRA-CA: Francés (Canadá); FRA-CH: Francés (Suiza); GLE: Irlandés; GLG- Gallego; GRC: Griego antiguo; GRN: Guaraní; GSW- Alemán suizo; GUJ: Gujarati; HAU: Hausa; HEB- Hebreo; HIN- Hindi; HRV- Croata; HUN- Húngaro; HYE: Armenio; IBO: Igbo; INC- Indonesio; IND- Indonesio; IRA- Iraní; ICE: Islandés; ITA- Italiano; JAV: Javanés; JPN- Japonés; KAL: Groenlandés; KAN: Canarés; KAT: Georgiano; KAZ- Kazajo; KHM: Camboyano; KIN:  Kinyarwanda; KIR- Kirguís; KOR- Coreano; KUR- Kurdo; LAO: Lao; LAT- Latín; LAV- Letón; LIN: Lingala; LIT- Lituano; LTZ: Luxemburgués; MAL: Malayo; MAR: Maratí; MDR- Mandarín; MKD: Macedonio; MLG: Malgache; MLT: Maltés; MON- Mongol; MRI: Maori; MAL: Malayo; MYA: Birmano; Multilingual- Multilingüe (no específico para un idioma); NAV: Navajo; NEP- Nepalí; NLD: Neerlandés; NLD-BE: Neerlandés (Bélgica); NNO: Noruego (nynorsk); NOB: Noruego (Bokmål); NOR- Noruego; NYA: Chichewa; ORM: Oromo; PAN: Punjabi; POL- Polaco; POR- Portugués; POR-BRA:  Portugués (Brasil); PUS: Pastún; QUE: Quechua; ROH- Romanche; RUM: Rumano; RUS- Ruso; SCR- Croata; SLK- Eslovaco; SLV- Esloveno; SME: Sami septentrional; SMO: Samoano; SOM: Somalí; SOT: Sotho del Sur; SPA: Español; SPA-LATAM: Español (Latinoamérica); SPA-MX: Español (México); SQI: Albanés; SRP- Serbio; SUN: Sondanés; SWA: Suajili; SWE- Sueco; TAM: Tamil; TEL: Télug; TGK: Tayiko; TGL- Tagalog; THA- Tailandés; TON:Tongano; TUK- Turcomano; TUR- Turco; UIG: Uigur; UKR- Ucraniano; URD: Urdu; UZB: Uzbeko; VIE- Vietnamita; WOL: Wolof; XHO: Xhosa; YID: Yiddish; YOR: Yoruba; ZHO (simpl): Chino (simplificado); ZHO (tr): Chino (tradicional); ZUL: Zulú; Otros
lt-LT: Kalbos versija: AAR – afarų; AFR – afrikanų; AKA – akanų; AMH – amharų; ARA – arabų; ARA-EG – arabų (Egiptas); ARA-GUL – arabų (Persijos įlanka); ARA-IQ – arabų (Irakas); ARA-LEV – arabų (levantų); ARA-MAG – arabų (magribų); ARA-SUD – arabų (sudaniečių); ASM – asamų; AYM – aimarų; AZE – azerbaidžaniečių; BEL – baltarusių; BEN – bengalų; BOD – tibetiečių; BOS – bosnių; BRA – Brazilijos portugalų; BRE – bretonų; BUL – bulgarų; CAT – katalonų; CES – čekų; CRO – kroatų; CYM – valų; DAN – danų; DEU – vokiečių; DEU-BE – vokiečių (Belgija); DEU-CH – vokiečių (Šveicarija); ELL – graikų; ENG – anglų; ENG-AU – anglų (Australija); ENG-CA – anglų (Kanada); ENG-GB – anglų (Jungtinė Karalystė); ENG-HK – anglų (Honkongas); ENG-IN – anglų (Indija); ENG-NZ – anglų (Naujoji Zelandija); ENG-SG – anglų (Singapūras); ENG-US – anglų (Jungtinės Valstijos); ENG-ZA – anglų (Pietų Afrika); EPO – esperanto; EST – estų; EUS – baskų; EWE – evų; FAO – farerų; FAS – farsi; FAS – persų; FIL – filipiniečių; FIN – suomių; FRA – prancūzų; FRA-BE – prancūzų (Belgija); FRA-CA – prancūzų (Kanada); FRA-CH – prancūzų (Šveicarija); GLE – airių; GLG – galisų; GRC – senovės graikų; GRN – gvaranių; GSW – Šveicarijos vokiečių; GUJ – gudžaratų; HAU – hausų; HEB – hebrajų; HIN – hindi; HRV – kroatų; HUN – vengrų; HYE – armėnų; IBO – igbų; INC – indoneziečių; IND – indoneziečių; IRA – iraniečių; ISL – islandų; ITA – italų; JAV – javiečių; JPN – japonų; KAL – grenlandų; KAN – Kannada; KAT – kartvelų; KAZ – kazachų; KHM – khmerų; KIN – kinjaruandų; KIR – kirgizų; KOR – korėjiečių; KUR – kurdų; LAO – laosiečių; LAT- lotynų; LAV – latvių; LIN – lingala; LIT – lietuvių; LTZ – liuksemburgiečių; MAL – malajalių; MAR – maratų; MDR – mandarinų; MKD – makedonų; MLG – malagasų; MLT – maltiečių; MON – mongolų; MRT – maorių; MSA – malajiečių; MYA – birmiečių; Daugiakalbė – daugiakalbė (netaikoma tik vienai kalbai); NAV – navahų; NEP – nepaliečių; NLD – olandų; NLD-BE – olandų (Belgija); NNO – norvegų (Nynorsk); NOB – norvegų (Bokmål); NOR – norvegų; NYA – čevų; ORM – oromų; PAN – pendžabų; POL – lenkų; POR – portugalų; POR-BR – portugalų (Brazilija); PUS – puštūnų; QUE – kečujų; ROH – retoromanų; RON – rumunų; RUS – rusų; SCR – kroatų; SLK – slovakų; SLV – slovėnų; SME – Šiaurės samių; SMO – Samoa; SOM – somaliečių; SOT – Pietų soto; SPA – ispanų; SPA-LATAM – ispanų (Lotynų Amerika); SPA-MX – ispanų (Meksika); SQI – albanų; SRP – serbų; SUN – sundų; SWA – svahilių; SWE – švedų; TAM – tamilų; TEL – telugų; TGK – tadžikų; TGL – tagalų; THA – tajų; TON – tonganų; TUK – turkmėnų; TUR – turkų; UIG - uigūrų; UKR – ukrainiečių; URD – urdų; UZB – uzbekų; VIE – vietnamiečių; WOL – volofų; XHO – kosų; YID – jidiš; YOR – jorubų; ZHO (supapr.) – kinų (supaprastinta); ZHO (tr.) – kinų (tradicinė); ZUL – zulų; Kita
ro-RO: Versiune lingvistică: AAR - Afar; AFR- Afrikaans; AKA- Akan; AMH- Amharică; ARA- Arabă; ARA-EG- Arabă (Egipt); ARA-GUL- Arabă (Golf); ARA-IQ- Arabă (Irak); ARA-LEV - Arabă (Levantină); ARA-MAG- Arabă (Maghrebiană); ARA-SUD- Arabă (Sudaneză); ASM- Asameză; AYM- Aymara; AZE- Azerbaidjană; BEL- Belarusă; BEN- Bengali; BOD- Tibetană; BOS- Bosniacă; BRA- Portugheză braziliană; BRE- Bretonă; BUL- Bulgară; CAT- Catalană; CES- Cehă; CRO- Croată; CYM- Galeză; DAN- Daneză; DEU- Germană; DEU-BE- Germană (Belgia); DEU-CH- Germană (Elveția); ELL- Greacă; ENG- Engleză; ENG-AU- Engleză (Australia); ENG-CA- Engleză (Canada); ENG-GB- Engleză (Regatul Unit); ENG-HK- Engleză (Hong Kong); ENG-IN- Engleză (India); ENG-NZ- Engleză (Noua Zeelandă); ENG-SG- Engleză (Singapore); ENG-US- Engleză (Statele Unite); ENG-ZA- Engleză (Africa de Sud); EPO- Esperanto; EST- Estonă; EUS- Bască; EWE- Ewe; FAO- Feroeză; FAS- Farsi; FAS- Persană; FIL- Filipineză; FIN- Finlandeză; FRA- Franceză; FRA-BE- Franceză (Belgia); FRA-CA- Franceză (Canada); FRA-CH- Franceză (Elveția); GLE- Irlandeză; GLG- Galiciană; GRC- Greaca veche; GRN- Guarani; GSW- Germană (Elveția); GUJ- Gujarati; HAU- Hausa; HEB- Ebraică; HIN- Hindi; CRO- Croată; HUN- Maghiară; HYE- Armeană; IBO- Igbo; INC- Indoneziană; IND- Indoneziană; IRA - Iraniană; ISL- Islandeză; ITA- Italiană; JAV- Javaneză; JPN- Japoneză; KAL- Groenlandeză; KAN- Kannada; KAT- Georgiană; KAZ - Kazahă; KHM- Khmeră; KIN- Kinyarwanda; IR- Kârgâză; KOR- Coreeană; KUR- kurdă; LAO- Lao; LAT- Latină; LAV- Letonă; LIN- Lingala; LIT- Lituaniană; LTZ- Luxemburgheză; MAL- Malayalam; MAR- Marathi; MDR- Mandar; MKD- Macedoneană; MLG- Malagasy; MLT- Malteză; MON- Mongolă; MRI- Maori; MSA- Malaeză; MYA- Birmană; Multilingv - multilingv (nu este specific unei limbi); NAV- Navajo; NEP- Nepaleză; NLD- Olandeză; NLD-BE- Olandeză (Belgia); NNO - Norvegiană (Nynorsk); NOB - Norvegiană (Bokmål); NOR- Norvegiană; NYA- Chichewa; ORM- Oromo; PAN- Punjabi; POL- Poloneză; POR- Portugheză; POR-BR- Portugheză (Brazilia); PUS- Pashto; QUE- Quechua; ROH- Retoromană; RON- Română; RUS- Rusă; SCR- Croată; SLK- Slovacă; SLV- Slovenă; SME- Northern Sámi; SMO- Samoană; SOM- Somaleză; SOT- Sotho de Sud; SPA- Spaniolă; SPA-LATAM- Spaniolă (America Latină); SPA-MX- Spaniolă (Mexic); SQI- Albaneză; SRP- Sârbă; SUN- Sundaneză; SWA- Swahili; SWE- Suedeză; TAM- Tamilă; TEL- Telugu; TGK- Tadjică; TGL- Tagalog; THA- Thailandeză; TON- Tongan; TUK- Turkmenă; TUR- Turcă; UIG- Uigură; UKR - Ucraineană; URD- Urdu; UZB- Uzbecă; VIE- Vietnameză; WOL- Wolof; XHO- Xhosa; YID- Idiș; YOR- Yoruba; ZHO (simplificat) - Chineză (simplificată); ZHO (tr) - Chineză (tradițională); ZUL- Zulu; Altele
th: เวอร์ชันภาษา: AAR- อาฟาร์; AFR- ภาษาแอฟริกัน; AKA- อาคาน; AMH- อัมฮาริก; ARA- ภาษาอาหรับ; ARA-EG- อาหรับ (อียิปต์); ARA-GUL- อาหรับ (อ่าว); ARA-IQ- อาหรับ (อิรัก); ARA-LEV- อาหรับ (ลิแวนต์); ARA-MAG- อาหรับ (มัฆริบ); ARA-SUD- อาหรับ (ซูดาน); ASM- อัสสัม; AYM- อายมารา; AZE- อาเซอร์ไบจาน; BEL- เบลารุส; BEN- เบงกอล; BOD- ทิเบต; BOS- บอสเนีย; BRA- ภาษาโปรตุเกสแบบบราซิล; BRE- เบรอตง; BUL- ภาษาบัลแกเรีย; CAT- ภาษาคาตาลัน; CES- เช็ก; CRO- ภาษาโครเอเชีย; CYM- เวลส์; DAN- ภาษาเดนมาร์ก; DEU- ภาษาเยอรมัน; DEU-BE- ภาษาเยอรมัน (เบลเยียม); DEU-CH- ภาษาเยอรมัน (สวิตเซอร์แลนด์); ELL- กรีก; ENG- ภาษาอังกฤษ; ENG-AU- อังกฤษ (ออสเตรเลีย); ENG-CA- อังกฤษ (แคนาดา); ENG-GB- อังกฤษ (สหราชอาณาจักร); ENG-HK- อังกฤษ (ฮ่องกง); ENG-IN- ภาษาอังกฤษ (อินเดีย); ENG-NZ- อังกฤษ (นิวซีแลนด์); ENG-SG- ภาษาอังกฤษ (สิงคโปร์); ENG-US- ภาษาอังกฤษ (สหรัฐอเมริกา); ENG-ZA- อังกฤษ (แอฟริกาใต้); EPO- ภาษาเอสเปอแรนโต; EST- ภาษาเอสโตเนีย; EUS- บาสก์; EWE- อีเว่; FAO- แฟโร; FAS- ภาษาฟาร์ซี; FAS- เปอร์เซีย; FIL- ฟิลิปปินส์; FIN- ภาษาฟินแลนด์; FRA- ฝรั่งเศส; FRA-BE- ฝรั่งเศส (เบลเยียม); FRA-CA- ฝรั่งเศส (แคนาดา); FRA-CH- ฝรั่งเศส (สวิตเซอร์แลนด์); GLE- ไอริช; GLG- ภาษากาลิเซีย; GRC- กรีกโบราณ; GRN- กวารานี; GSW- ภาษาเยอรมันแบบสวิส; GUJ- คุชราต; HAU- เฮาซา; HEB- ภาษาฮีบรู; HIN- ภาษาฮินดี; HRV- ภาษาโครเอเชีย; HUN- ภาษาฮังการี; HYE- อาร์เมเนีย; IBO- อิกโบ; INC- ภาษาอินโดนีเซีย; IND- ภาษาอินโดนีเซีย; IRA- ภาษาอิหร่าน; ISL- ไอซ์แลนด์; ITA- ภาษาอิหร่าน; JAV- ชวา; JPN- ภาษาญี่ปุ่น; KAL- กรีนแลนด์; KAN- กันนะฑะ; KAT- จอร์เจีย; KAZ- ภาษาคาซัค; KHM- เขมร; KIN- คินยารวันดา; KIR- ภาษาคีร์กีซ; KOR- ภาษาเกาหลี; KUR- ภาษาเคิร์ด; LAO- ลาว; LAT- ภาษาละติน; LAV- ภาษาละติน; LIN- ลิงกาลา; LIT- ภาษาลิทัวเนีย; LTZ- ลัมเซมเบิร์ก; MAL- มลยาฬัม; MAR- มราฐี; MDR- ภาษามันดาร์; MKD- มาซิโดเนีย; MLG- มาลากาซี; MLT- มอลตา; MON- ภาษามองโกเลีย; MRI- เมารี; MSA- มาเลย์; MYA- เมียนมาร์; Multilingual- หลายภาษา (ไม่เจาะจงภาษาใดภาษาหนึ่ง); NAV- นาวาโฮ; NEP- ภาษาเนปาล; NLD- ดัตช์; NLD-BE- ดัตช์ (เบลเยียม); NNO- นอร์เวย์ (นีนอร์สก์); NOB- นอร์เวย์ (บูกโมล); NOR- ภาษานอร์เวย์; NYA- ชิเชวา; ORM- โอโรโม; PAN- ปัญจาบ; POL- ภาษาโปแลนด์; POR- ภาษาโปรตุเกส; POR-BR- โปรตุเกส (บราซิล); PUS- ปาทาน; QUE- เกชัว; ROH- ภาษาโรมานช์; RON- โรมาเนีย; RUS- ภาษารัสเซีย; SCR- ภาษาโครเอเชีย; SLK- ภาษาสโลวัก; SLV- ภาษาสโลวีเนีย; SME- ซามิตอนเหนือ; SMO- ซามัว; SOM- โซมาลี; SOT- โซโทตอนใต้; SPA- สเปน; SPA-LATAM- สเปน (ละตินอเมริกา); SPA-MX- สเปน (เม็กซิโก); SQI- แอลเบเนีย; SRP- ภาษาเซอร์เบีย; SUN- ซุนดา; SWA- สวาฮีลี; SWE- ภาษาสวีเดน; TAM- ทมิฬ; TEL- เตเลกู; TGK- ทาจิก; TGL- ภาษาตากาล็อก; THA-ไทย; TON- ตองกา; TUK- เติร์กเมน; TUR- ภาษาตุรกี; UIG- อุยกูร์; UKR- ภาษายูเครน; URD- อูรดู; UZB- อุซเบก; VIE- ภาษาเวียดนาม; WOL- โวลอฟ; XHO- โคซา; YID- ยิดดิช; YOR- โยรูบา; ZHO (simpl)- จีน (ตัวย่อ); ZHO (tr)- จีน (ตัวเต็ม); ZUL- ซูลู; อื่นๆ
nb: Språkversjon: AAR- Afar; AFR- Afrikaans; AKA- Akan; AMH- Amharisk; ARA- Arabisk; ARA-EG- Arabisk (Egypt); ARA-GUL- Arabisk (golfen); ARA-IQ- Arabisk (Irak); ARA-LEV- Arabisk (levantinsk); ARA-MAG- Arabisk (Maghreb); ARA-SUD- Arabisk (sudansk); ASM- Assamesisk; AYM- Aymara; AZE- Aserbajdsjansk; BEL- Belarusisk; BEN- Bengalsk; TIB- Tibetansk; BOS- Bosnisk; BRA- Brasiliansk portugisisk; BRE- Bretonsk; BUL- Bulgarsk; CAT- Katalansk; CZE- Tsjekkisk; CRO- Kroatisk; CYM- Walisisk; DAN- Dansk; DEU- Tysk; DEU-BE- Tysk (Belgia); DEU-CH Tysk (Sveits); GRE- Gresk; ENG- Engelsk; ENG-AU- Engelsk (Australia); ENG-CA- Engelsk (Canada); ENG-GB- Engelsk (Storbritannia); ENG-HK- Engelsk (Honkong); ENG-IN- Engelsk (India); ENG-NZ- Engelsk (New Zealand); ENG-SG- Engelsk (Singapore); ENG-US- Engelsk (USA); ENG-ZA- Engelsk (Sør-Afrika); EPO- Esperanto; EST- Estisk; EUS- Baskisk; EWE- Ewe; FAO- Færøysk; FAS- Farsi; FAS- Persisk; FIL- Filipinsk; FIN- Finsk; FRE- Fransk; FRA-BE- Fransk (Belgia); FRA-CA- Fransk (Canada); FRA-CH- Fransk (Sveits); GLE- Irsk; GLG- Galisisk; GRC- Gammelgresk; GRN- Guarani; GSW- Sveitsisk tysk; GUJ- Gujarati; HAU- Hausa; HEB- Hebraisk; HIN- Hindi; HRV- Kroatisk; HUN- Ungarsk; HYE- Armensk; IBO- Igbo; INC- Indonesisk; IND- Indonesisk; IRA- Iransk; ISL- Islandsk; ITA- Italiensk; JAV- Javanesisk; JPN- Japansk; KAL- Grønlandsk; KAN- Kannada; KAT- Georgisk; KAZ- Kazakh; KHM- Khmer; KIN- Njarunda (kinyarwanda); KIR- Kirghiz; KOR- Koreansk; KUR- Kurdisk; LAO- Laotisk; LAT- Latin; LAV- Latvisk; LIN- Lingala; LIT- Litauisk; LTZ- Luxemburgsk; MAL- Malayalam; MAR- Marathi; MDR- Mandar; MKD- Makedonsk; MLG- Gassisk; MLT- Maltesisk; MON- Mongolsk; MRI- Maorisk; MSA- Malayisk; MYA- Burmesisk; Multilingual- flerspråklig (ikke spesifikk for ett språk); NAV- Navaho; NEP- Nepalsk; NLD- Nederlandsk; NLD-BE- Nederlandsk (Belgia); NNO- Norsk (nynorsk); NOB- Norsk (bokmål); NOR- Norsk; NYA- Chichewa; ORM- Oromo; PAN- Panjabi; POL- Polsk; POR- Portugisisk; POR-BR- Portugisisk (Brasil); PUS- Pasjto; QUE- Quechua; ROH- Romansk; RUM- Rumensk; RUS- Russisk; SCR- Kroatisk; SLK- Slovakisk; SLV- Slovensk; SME- Nordsamisk; SMO- Samoansk; SOM- Somali; SOT- Sør-Sotho; SPA- Spansk; SPA-LATAM- Spansk (Latin-Amerika); SPA-MX- Spansk (Mexico); ALB- Albansk; SRP- Serbisk; SUN- Sundanesisk; SWA- Swahili; SWE- Svensk; Tam- Tamil; TEL- Telugu; TGK- Tadsjikisk; TGL- Tagalog; THA- Thai; TON- Tongansk; TUK- Turkmensk; TUR- Tyrkisk; UIG- Uigurisk; UKR- Ukrainsk; URD- Urdu; UZB- Usbekisk; VIE- Vietnamesisk; WOL- Wolof; XHO- Xhosa; YID- Jiddisk; YOR- Joruba; ZHO (simpl)- Forenklet kinesisk; ZHO (tr)- Tradisjonell kinesisk; ZUL- Zulu; Annen
nl: Taalversie: AAR- Afar; AFR- Afrikaans; AKA- Akan; AMH- Amhaars; ARA-Arabisch; ARA-EG- Arabisch (Egypte); ARA-GUL- Arabisch (Golf); ARA-IQ- Arabisch (Irak); ARA-LEV - Arabisch (Levantijns); ARA-MAG- Arabic (Maghrebi); ARA-SUD - Arabisch (Soedanees); ASM- Assamees; AYM - Aymara; AZE- Azerbaijani; BEL-Wit-Russisch; BEN- Bengali; BOD- Tibetaans; BOS- Bosnisch; BRA- Braziliaans Portugees; BRE- Breton; BUL- Bulgaars; CAT- Catalaans; CES- Tsjechisch; CRO-Kroatisch; CYM- Welsh; DAN- Deens; DEU- Duits; DEU-BE- Duits (België); DEU-CH- Duits (Zwitserland); ELL- Grieks; ENG- Engels; ENG-AU- Engels (Australië); ENG-CA- Engels (Canada); ENG-GB- Engels (Verenigd Koninkrijk); ENG-HK- Engels (Hongkong); ENG-IN- Engels (India); ENG-NZ- Engels (Nieuw-Zeeland); ENG-SG- Engels (Singapore); ENG-VS-Engels (Verenigde Staten); ENG-ZA- Engels (Zuid-Afrika); EPO- Esperanto; EST- Ests; EUS- Baskisch; EWE- Ewe; FAO-Faeröers; FAS- Farsi; FAS- Perzisch; FIL- Filipijns; FIN- Fins; FRA - Frans; FRA-BE- Frans (België); FRA-CA- Frans (Canada); FRA-CH- Frans (Zwitserland); GLE-Iers; GLG- Galicisch; GRC - Oud Grieks; GRN- Guarani; GSW- Zwitserduits; GUJ- Gujarati; HAU- Hausa; HEB- Hebreeuws; HIN- Hindi; HRV- Kroatisch; HUN- Hongaars; HYE- Armeens; IBO- Igbo; INC- Indonesisch; IND- Indonesisch; IRA- Iraans; ISL- IJslands; ITA- Italiaans; JAV- Javaans; JPN- Japans; KAL- Groenlands; KAN- Kannada; KAT- Georgisch; KAZ- Kazachs; KHM- Khmer; KIN- Kinyarwanda; KIR- Kirgizisch; KOR- Koreaans; KUR- Koerdisch; LAO- Lao; LAT- Latijn; LAV- Lets; LIN- Lingala; LIT- Litouws; LTZ- Luxemburgs; MAL- Malayalam; MAR- Marathi; MDR- Mandarijn; MKD- Macedonisch; MLG-Malagassisch; MLT-Maltees; MON- Mongools; MRI- Maori; MAL- Maleis; MYA- Birmees; Meertalig- meertalig (niet specifiek voor één taal); NAV- Navajo; NEP- Nepalees; NLD- Nederlands; NLD-BE- Nederlands (België); NNO- Noors (Nynorsk); NOB- Noors (Bokmål); NOR- Noors; NYA- Chichewa; ORM-Oromo; PAN- Punjabi; POL- Pools; POR- Portugees; POR-BR- Portugees (Brazilië); PUS- Pashto; QUE- Quechua; ROH- Reto-Romaans; RON- Roemeens; RUS- Russisch; SCR- Kroatisch; SLK- Slowaaks; SLV- Sloveens; MKB - Noord-Samisch; SMO- Samoaans; SOM- Somali; SOT - Zuid-Sotho; SPA- Spaans; SPA-LATAM- Spaans (Latijns-Amerikaans); SPA-MX- Spaans (Mexico); SQI - Albanees; SRP- Servisch; SUN- Soendanees; SWA-Swahili; SWE- Zweeds; TAM- Tamil; TEL- Telugu; TGK- Tajik; TGL- Tagalog; THA- Thais; TON-Tongaans; TUK-Turkmeens; TUR-Turks; UIG- Oeigoers; UKR-Oekraïens; URD- Urdu; UZB- Oezbeeks; VIE- Vietnamees; WOL- Wolof; XHO- Xhosa; YID- Jiddisch; YOR- Yoruba; ZHO (vereenvoudigd) - Chinees (vereenvoudigd); ZHO (tr)- Chinees (traditioneel); ZUL- Zulu; Andere
sv: Språkversion: AAR – afar; AFR – afrikaans; AKA – akan; AMH – amhariska; ARA – arabiska; ARA-EG – arabiska (Egypten); ARA-GUL – arabiska (bukten); ARA-IQ – arabiska (Irak); ARA-LEV – arabiska (levantinsk); ARA-MAG – arabiska (Maghrebi); ARA-SUD – arabiska (sudanesiska); ASM – assamiska; AYM – aymara; AZE – azerbaijani; BEL – vitryska; BEN-bengali; BOD – tibetanska; BOS – bosniska; BRA – brasiliansk portugisiska; BRE – breton; BUL – bulgariska; CAT – katalanska; CZE – tjeckiska; CRO – kroatiska; CYM – walesiska; DAN – danska; DEU – tyska; DEU-BE – tyska (Belgien); DEU-CH – tyska (Schweiz); GRE – grekiska; ENG – engelska; ENG-AU – engelska (Australien); ENG-CA – engelska (Kanada); ENG-GB – engelska (Storbritannien); ENG-HK – engelska (Hong Kong); ENG-IN – engelska (Indien); ENG-NZ – engelska (Nya Zeeland); ENG-SG – engelska (Singapore); ENG-US – engelska (Förenta Staterna); ENG-ZA – engelska (Sydafrika); EPO – esperanto; EST – estniska; BAQ – baskiska; EWE – ewe; FAO – färöiska; FAS – farsi; PER – persiska; PHI – filippinska; FIN – finska; FRE – franska; FRE-BE – franska (Belgien); FRA-CA – franska (Kanada); FRE-CH – franska (Schweiz); GLE – irländska; GLG – galiciska; GRC – antik grekiska; GRN – guarani; GSW – schweizisk tyska; GUJ – gujarati; HAU – hausa; HEB – hebreiska; HIN – hindi; HRV – kroatiska; HUN – ungerska; ARM – armeniska; IBO – igbo; INC – indonesiska; IND – indonesiska; IRA – iranska; ICE – isländska; ITA – italienska; JAV – javanesiska; JPN – japanska; KAL – grönländska; KAN – kannada; GEO – georgiska; KAZ – kazakiska; KHM – khmer; KIN – kinyarwanda; KIR – kirgisiska; KOR – koreanska; KUR – kurdiska; LAO – laotiska; LAT – latin; LAV – lettiska; LIN – lingala; LIT – litauiska; LTZ – luxemburgiska; MAL – malayalam; MAR – marathi; MDR – mandar; MKD – makedonska; MLG – madagaskiska; MLT – maltesiska; MON – mongoliska; MRI – maori; MSA – malay; MYA – burmesiska; Flerspråkig – flerspråkig (inte specifikt för ett språk); NAV – navajo; NEP – nepali; NLD – nederlänska; DUT-BE – nederländska (Belgien); NNO – norska (nynorsk); NOB – norska (bokmål); NOR – norska; NYA – chichewa; ORM – oromo; PAN – punjabi; POL – polska; POR – portugisiska; POR-BRA – portugisiska (Brasilien); PUS – pashto; QUE – quechua; ROH – rätoromanska; RUM – rumänska; RUS – ryska; SCR – kroatiska; SLK – slovakiska; SLV – slovenska; SME – nordsamiska; SMO – samoanska; SOM – somali; SOT – sotho; SPA – spanska; SPA-LATAM – spanska (Latinamerika); SPA-MX – spanska (Mexiko); SQI – albanska; SRP – serbiska; SUN – sundanesiska; SWA – swahili; SWE – svenska; TAM – tamil; TEL – telugu; TGK – tadzjikiska; TGL – tagalog; THA – thai; TON – tongan; TUK – turkmeniska; TUR – turkiska; UIG – uigur; UKR – ukrainska; URD – urdu; UZB – uzbekiska; VIE – vietnamesiska; WOL – wolof; XHO – xhosa; YID – yiddish; YOR – yoruba; CHI – förenklad kinesiska; CHI – traditionell kinesiska; ZUL – zulu; Annat
pl: Wersja językowa: AAR — afar; AFR- Afrikaans; AKA — akan; AMH — amharski; ARA - arabski; ARA-EG — arabski (Egipt); ARA-GUL — arabski (Zatoka); ARA-IQ — arabski (Irak); ARA-LEV — arabski (syryjsko-palestyński); ARA-MAG — arabski (Maghreb); ARA-SUD — arabski (sudański); ASM — asamski; AYM — ajmara; AZE — azerbejdżański; BEL — białoruski; BEN — bengalski; BOD — tybetański; BOS — bośniacki; BRA - portugalski brazylijski; BRE — bretoński; BUL - bułgarski; CAT - kataloński; CES — czeski; CRO - chorwacki; CYM — walijski; DAN - duński; DEU - niemiecki; DEU-BE- niemiecki (Belgia); DEU-CH- niemiecki (Szwajcaria); ELL — grecki; ENG - angielski); ENG-AU — angielski (Australia); ENG-CA — angielski (Kanada); ENG-GB — angielski (Zjednoczone Królestwo); ENG-HK — angielski (Hongkong); ENG-IN- angielski (Indie); ENG-NZ — angielski (Nowa Zelandia); ENG-SG- angielski (Singapur); ENG-US- angielski (Stany Zjednoczone); ENG-ZA — angielski (Republika Południowej Afryki); EPO - esperanto; EST - estoński; EUS — baskijski; EWE — ewe; FAO — farerski; FAS - perski; FAS — perski; FIL — filipiński; FIN - fiński; FRA — francuski; FRE-BE — francuski (Belgia); FRA-CA — francuski (Kanada); FRA-CH — francuski (Szwajcaria); GLE — irlandzki; GLG - galicyjski; GRC — greka starożytna; GRN — guarani; GSW - szwajcarski niemiecki; GUJ — gudżarati; HAU — hausa; HEB - hebrajski; HIN - hindi; HRV - chorwacki; HUN - węgierski; HYE — ormiański; IBO — igbo; INC - indonezyjski; IND - indonezyjski; IRA - irański; ISL — islandzki; ITA - włoski; JAV — jawajski; JPN - japoński; KAL — grenlandzki; KAN — kannada; KAT — gruziński; KAZ - kazachski; KHN — khmerski; KIN — kinyarwanda; KIR- kirgiski; KOR- koreański; KUR - kurdyjski; LAO — laotański; LAT- łaciński; LAV - łotewski; LIN — lingala; LIT - litewski; LTZ — luksemburski; MAL — malajalam; MAR — marathi; MDR- mandaryński; MKD — macedoński; MLG — malgaski; MLT — maltański; MON - mongolski; MRI — maoryjski; MSA — malajski; MYA — birmański; Wielojęzyczny- wielojęzyczny (nie tylko dla jednego języka); NAV — nawaho; NEP - nepalski; NLD — niderlandzki; NLD-BE — niderlandzki (Belgia); NNO — norweski (Nynorsk); NOB — norweski (Bokmål); NOR - norweski; NYA — cziczewa (Chichewa); ORM — oromo; PAN — pendżabski; POL- polski; POR - portugalski; POR-BRA — portugalski (Brazylia); PUS — paszto; QUE — keczua; ROH- romansh; RON — rumuński; RUS- rosyjski; SCR - chorwacki; SLK - słowacki; SLV - słoweński; SME — północno-samijski; SMO — samoański; SOM — somalijski; SOT — południowe sotho; SPA — hiszpański; SPA-LATAM — hiszpański (Ameryka Łacińska); ESP-MX — hiszpański (Meksyk); SQI — albański; SRP - serbski; SUN — sundajski; SWA — suahili; SWE - szwedzki; TAM — tamilski; TEL — telugu; TGK — tadżycki; TGL - tagalski; THA - tajski; TON — tongański; TUK — turkmeński; TUR - turecki; UIG — ujgurski; UKR - ukraiński; URD — urdu; UZB — uzbecki; VIE - wietnamski; WLF — wolof; XHO — xhosa; YID — jidysz; YOR — joruba; ZHO (simpl) — chiński (uproszczony); ZHO (tr) — chiński (tradycyjny); ZUL — zulu; Pozostałe
zh-CN: 语言版本: AAR - 阿法尔语; AFR - 南非荷兰语; AKA - 阿肯语; AMH - 阿姆哈拉语; ARA - 阿拉伯语; ARA-EG - 阿拉伯语（埃及）; ARA-GUL - 阿拉伯语（海湾）; ARA-IQ - 阿拉伯语（伊拉克）; ARA-LEV - 阿拉伯语（黎凡特）; ARA-MAG - 阿拉伯语（马格里布）; ARA-SUD - 阿拉伯语（苏丹）; ASM - 阿萨姆语; AYM - 艾马拉语; AZE - 阿塞拜疆语; BEL - 白俄罗斯语; BEN - 孟加拉语; BOD - 藏语; BOS - 波斯尼亚语; BRA - 巴西葡萄牙语; BRE - 布列塔尼语; BUL - 保加利亚语; CAT - 加泰罗尼亚语; CES - 捷克语; CRO - 克罗地亚语; CYM - 威尔士语; DAN - 丹麦语; DEU - 德语; DEU-BE - 德语（比利时）; DEU-CH - 德语（瑞士）; ELL - 希腊语; ENG - 英语; ENG-AU - 英语（澳大利亚）; ENG-CA - 英语（加拿大）; ENG-GB - 英语（英国）; ENG-HK - 英语（香港）; ENG-IN - 英语（印度）; ENG-NZ - 英语（新西兰）; ENG-SG - 英语（新加坡）; ENG-US - 英语（美国）; ENG-ZA - 英语（南非）; EPO - 世界语; EST - 爱沙尼亚语; EUS - 巴斯克语; EWE - 埃维语; FAO - 法罗语; FAS - 波斯语; FAS - 波斯语; FIL - 菲律宾语; FIN - 芬兰语; FRA - 法语; FRA-BE - 法语（比利时）; FRA-CA - 法语（加拿大）; FRA-CH - 法语（瑞士）; GLE - 爱尔兰语; GLG - 加利西亚语; GRC - 古希腊语; GRN - 瓜拉尼语; GSW - 瑞士德语; GUJ - 古吉拉特语; HAU - 豪萨语; HEB - 希伯来语; HIN - 印地语; HRV - 克罗地亚语; HUN - 匈牙利语; HYE - 亚美尼亚语; IBO - 伊博语; INC - 印度尼西亚语; IND - 印度尼西亚语; IRA - 伊朗语; ISL - 冰岛语; ITA - 意大利语; JAV - 爪哇语; JPN - 日语; KAL - 格陵兰语; KAN - 卡纳达语; KAT - 格鲁吉亚语; KAZ - 哈萨克语; KHM - 高棉语; KIN - 卢旺达语; KIR - 吉尔吉斯语; KOR - 韩语; KUR - 库尔德语; LAO - 老挝语; LAT - 拉丁语; LAV - 拉脱维亚语; LIN - 林加拉语; LIT - 立陶宛语; LTZ - 卢森堡语; MAL - 马拉雅拉姆语; MAR - 马拉地语; MDR - 曼达尔语; MKD - 马其顿语; MLG - 马达加斯加语; MLT - 马耳他语; MON - 蒙古语; MRI - 毛利语; MSA - 马来语; MYA - 缅甸语; Multilingual - 多语言（不特定于一种语言）; NAV - 纳瓦霍语; NEP - 尼泊尔语; NLD - 荷兰语; NLD-BE - 荷兰语（比利时）; NNO - 挪威语（尼诺斯克语）; NOB - 挪威语（博克马尔语）; NOR - 挪威语; NYA - 齐切瓦语; ORM - 奥罗莫语; PAN - 旁遮普语; POL - 波兰语; POR - 葡萄牙语; POR-BR - 葡萄牙语（巴西）; PUS - 普什图语; QUE - 盖丘亚语; ROH - 罗曼什语; RON - 罗马尼亚语; RUS - 俄语; SCR - 克罗地亚语; SLK - 斯洛伐克语; SLV - 斯洛文尼亚语; SME - 北萨米语; SMO - 萨摩亚语; SOM - 索马里语; SOT - 南索托语; SPA - 西班牙语; SPA-LATAM - 西班牙语（拉丁美洲）; SPA-MX - 西班牙语（墨西哥）; SQI - 阿尔巴尼亚语; SRP - 塞尔维亚语; SUN - 巽他语; SWA - 斯瓦希里语; SWE - 瑞典语; TAM - 泰米尔语; TEL - 泰卢固语; TGK - 塔吉克语; TGL - 塔加拉族语; THA - 泰语; TON - 汤加语; TUK - 土库曼语; TUR - 土耳其语; UIG - 维吾尔语; UKR - 乌克兰语; URD - 乌尔都语; UZB - 乌兹别克语; VIE - 越南语; WOL - 沃洛夫语; XHO - 科萨语; YID - 意第绪语; YOR - 约鲁巴语; ZHO (simpl) - 中文（简体）; ZHO (tr) - 中文（繁体）; ZUL - 祖鲁语; 其他
ru: Языковая версия: AAR – афар; AFR – африкаанс; AKA – акан; AMH – амхарский; ARA – арабский; ARA-EG – арабский (Египет); ARA-GUL – арабский (страны Персидского залива); ARA-IQ – арабский (Ирак); ARA-LEV – арабский (левантийский); ARA-MAG – арабский (магрибский); ARA-SUD – арабский (суданский); ASM – ассамский; AYM – аймара; AZE – азербайджанский; BEL – белорусский; BEN – бенгальский; BOD – тибетский; BOS – боснийский; BRA – бразильский португальский; BRE – бретонский; BUL – болгарский; CAT – каталонский; CES – чешский; CRO – хорватский; CYM – валлийский; DAN – датский; DEU – немецкий; DEU-BE – немецкий (Бельгия); DEU-CH – немецкий (Швейцария); ELL – греческий; ENG – английский; ENG-AU – английский (Австралия); ENG-CA – английский (Канада); ENG-GB – английский (Великобритания); ENG-HK – английский (Гонконг); ENG-IN – английский (Индия); ENG-NZ – английский (Новая Зеландия); ENG-SG – английский (Сингапур); ENG-US – английский (США); ENG-ZA – английский (Южная Африка); EPO – эсперанто; EST – эстонский; EUS – баскский; EWE – эве; FAO – фарерский; FAS – фарси; FAS – персидский; FIL – филиппинский; FIN – финский; FRA – французский; FRA-BE – французский (Бельгия); FRA-CA – французский (Канада); FRA-CH – французский (Швейцария); GLE – ирландский; GLG – галисийский; GRC – древнегреческий; GRN – гуарани; GSW – швейцарский немецкий; GUJ – гуджарати; HAU – хауса; HEB – иврит; HIN – хинди; HRV – хорватский; HUN – венгерский; HYE – армянский; IBO – игбо; INC – индонезийский; IND – индонезийский; ИРА – иранский; ISL – исландский; ITA – итальянский; JAV – яванский; JPN – японский; KAL – гренландский; KAN – каннада; KAT – грузинский; KAZ – казахский; KHM – кхмерский; KIN – киньяруанда; KIR – киргизский; KOR – корейский; KUR – курдский; LAO – лаосский; LAT – латынь; LAV – латышский; LIN – лингала; LIT – литовский; LTZ – люксембургский; MAL – малаялам; MAR – маратхи; MDR – мандарский; MKD – македонский; MLG – малагасийский; MLT – мальтийский; MON – монгольский; МРТ – маори; MSA – малайский; MYA – бирманский; Многоязычный – многоязычный (не привязан к одному языку); NAV – навахо; NEP – непальский; NLD – голландский; NLD-BE – голландский (Бельгия); NNO – норвежский (нюнорск); NOB – норвежский (букмол); NOR – норвежский; NYA – чичева; ORM – оромо; PAN – пенджаби; POL – польский; POR – португальский; POR-BR – португальский (Бразилия); PUS – пушту; QUE – кечуа; ROH – ретороманский; RON – румынский; RUS – русский; SCR – хорватский; SLK – словацкий; SLV – словенский; SME – северосаамский; SMO – самоанский; SOM – сомалийский; SOT – южный сото; SPA – испанский; SPA-LATAM – испанский (Латинская Америка); SPA-MX – испанский (Мексика); SQI – албанский; SRP – сербский; SUN – суданский; SWA – суахили; SWE – шведский; TAM – тамильский; TEL – телугу; TGK – таджикский; TGL – тагальский; THA – тайский; TON – тонганский; TUK – туркменский; TUR – турецкий; UIG – уйгурский; UKR – украинский; URD – урду; UZB – узбекский; VIE – вьетнамский; WOL – волоф; XHO – коса; YID – идиш; YOR – йоруба; ZHO (simpl) – китайский (упрощенный); ZHO (tr) – китайский (традиционный); ZUL – зулу; Другой
zh-TW: 語言版本: AAR 阿法爾語; AFR 南非荷蘭語; AKA 阿寒語; AMH 阿姆哈拉語; ARA 阿拉伯語; ARA-EG 埃及阿拉伯語; ARA-GUL- 海灣阿拉伯語; ARA-IQ 伊拉克阿拉伯語; ARA-LEV 黎凡特阿拉伯語; ARA-MAG 馬格里布阿拉伯語; ARA-SUD 蘇丹阿拉伯語; ASM 阿薩姆語; AYM 艾馬拉語; AZE 亞塞拜然語; BEL 白俄羅斯語; BEN 孟加拉語; BOD 圖博語; BOS 波士尼亞語; BRA 巴西葡萄牙語; BRE 布列塔尼語; BUL 保加利亞語; CAT 加泰隆尼亞語; CZE 捷克語; CRO 克羅埃西亞語; CYM 威爾斯語; DAN 丹麥語; DEU 德語; DEU-BE 比利時德語; DEU-CH 瑞士德語; GRE 希臘語; ENG 英語; ENG-AU 澳洲英語; ENG-CA 加拿大英語; ENG-GB 英國英語; ENG-HK 香港英語; ENG-IN 印度英語; ENG-NZ 紐西蘭英語; ENG-SG 新加坡英語; ENG-US 美國英語; ENG-ZA 南非英語; EPO 世界語; EST 愛沙尼亞語; EUS 巴斯克語; EWE 埃維語; FAO 法羅語; FAS 波斯語; FAS 波斯語; PHI 菲律賓語; FIN 芬蘭語; FRE 法語; FRE-BE 比利時法語; FRA-CA 加拿大法語; FRE-CH 瑞士法語; GLE 愛爾蘭語; GLG 加利西亞語; GRC 古希臘語; GRN 瓜拉尼語; GSW 瑞士德語; GUJ 古吉拉特語; HAU 豪薩語; HEB 希伯來語; HIN 印度語; HRV 克羅埃西亞語; HUN 匈牙利語; HYE 亞美尼亞語; IBO 伊博語; INC 印尼語; IND 印尼語; IRA 伊朗語; ICE 冰島語; ITA 義大利語; JAV 爪哇語; JPN 日語; KAL 格陵蘭語; KAN 卡納達語; KAT 喬治亞語; KAZ 哈薩克語; KHM 高棉語; KIN 基尼亞盧安達語; KIR 吉爾吉斯語; KOR 韓語; KUR 庫德語; LAO 寮語; LAT 拉丁語; LAV 拉脫維亞語; LIN 林格拉語; LIT 立陶宛語; LTZ 盧森堡語; MAL 馬來語; MAR 馬拉地語; MRD 曼達爾語; MKD 馬其頓語; MLG 馬達加斯加語; MLT 馬爾他語; MON 蒙古語; MRI 毛利語; MSA 馬來語; MYA 緬甸語; 多語言 (無特定語言); NAV 納瓦荷語; NEP 尼泊爾語; NLD 荷蘭語; NLD-BE 比利時荷蘭語; NNO 挪威語（尼諾斯克語）; NOB 挪威語（博克馬爾語）; NOR 挪威語; NYA 齊切瓦語; ORM 奧羅莫語; PAN 旁遮普語; POL 波蘭語; POR 葡萄牙語; POR-BRA 巴西葡萄牙語; PUS 普什圖語; QUE 克丘亞語; ROH 羅曼什語; RON 羅馬尼亞語; RUS 俄語; SCR 克羅埃西亞語; SLK 斯洛伐克語; SLV 斯洛維尼亞語; SME 北薩米語; SMO 薩摩亞語; SOM 索馬利亞語; SOT 南索托語; SPA 西班牙語; SPA-LATAM 拉丁美洲西班牙語; SPA-MX 墨西哥西班牙語; SQI 阿爾巴尼亞語; SRP 塞爾維亞語; SUN 巽他語; SWA 斯瓦希里語; SWE 瑞典語; TAM 泰米爾語; TEL 泰盧固語; TGK 塔吉克語; TGL 他加祿語; THA 泰語; TON 東加語; TUK 土庫曼語; TUR 土耳其語; UIG 維吾爾語; UKR 烏克蘭語; URD 烏爾都語; UZB 烏茲別克語; VIE 越語; WOL 沃洛夫語; XHO 科薩語; YID 意第緒語; YOR 約魯巴語; ZHO (simpl)  簡體中文; ZHO (tr) 繁體中文; ZUL 祖魯語; 其他
pt-PT: Versão do idioma: AAR - Afar; AFR – Afrikaans; AKA - Akan; AMH - Amárico; ARA – Árabe; ARA-EG - Árabe (Egito); ARA-GUL - Árabe (Golfo); ARA-IQ - Árabe (Iraque); ARA-LEV - Árabe (levantino); ARA-MAG - Árabe (magrebino); ARA-SUD - Árabe (sudanês); ASM - Assamês; AYM - Aimará; AZE - Azeri; BEL - Bielorrusso; BEN - Bengali; BOD - Tibetano; BOS - Bósnio; BRA – Português do Brasil; BRE - Bretão; BUL – Búlgaro; CAT – Catalão; CES - Checo; CRO – Croata; CYM - Galês; DAN – Dinamarquês; DEU – Alemão; DEU-BE – Alemão (Bélgica); DEU-CH – Alemão (Suíça); ELL - Grego; ENG – Inglês; ENG-AU - Inglês (Austrália); ENG-CA - Inglês (Canadá); ENG-GB - Inglês (Reino Unido); ENG-HK - Inglês (Hong Kong); ENG-ING – Inglês (Índia); ENG-NZ - Inglês (Nova Zelândia); ENG-SG – Inglês (Singapura); ENG-US – Inglês (Estados Unidos); ENG-ZA - Inglês (África do Sul); EPO – Esperanto; EST – Estónio; EUS - Basco; EWE - Ewe; FAO - Faroense; FAS – Farsi; FAS - Persa; FIL - Filipino; FIN – Finlandês; FRA - Francês; FRE-BE - Francês (Bélgica); FRA-CA - Francês (Canadá); FRE-CH - Francês (Suíça); GLE - Irlandês; GLG – Galego; GRC - Grego antigo; GRN - Guarani; GSW – Alemão Suíço; GUJ - Gujaráti; HAU - Haúça; HEB – Hebraico; HIN – Hindi; HRV – Croata; HUN – Húngaro; ARM - Arménio; IBO - Ibo; INC – Indonésio; IND – Indonésio; IRA – Iraniano; ISL - Islandês; ITA – Italiano; JAV - Javanês; JPN – Japonês; KAL - Gronelandês; KAN - Kannada; KAT - Georgiano; KAZ – Cazaque; KHM - Cmere; KIN - Quiniaruanda; KIR – Quirguiz; KOR – Coreano; KUR – Curdo; LAO - Laociano; LAT – Latim; LAV – Letão; LIN - Lingala; LIT – Lituano; LTZ - Luxemburguês; MAL - Malaiala; MAR - Marati; MDR – Mandarim; MKD - Macedónio; MLG - Malgaxe; MLT - Maltês; MON – Mongol; MRI - Maori; MSA - Malaio; MYA - Birmanês; Multilingue – Multilingue (não específico para um idioma); NAV - Navajo; NEP – Nepalês; NLD - Neerlandês; NLD-BE - Neerlandês (Bélgica); NNO - Norueguês (Nynorsk); NOB - Norueguês (Bokmål); NOR – Norueguês; NYA - Chichewa; ORM - Oromo; PAN - Punjabi; POL – Polaco; POR – Português; POR-BR - Português (Brasil); PUS - Pastó; QUE - Quíchua; ROH – Romanche; RON - Romeno; RUS – Russo; SCR – Croata; SLK – Eslovaco; SLV – Esloveno; SME - Sámi do Norte; SMO - Samoano; SOM - Somaliano; SOT - Soto do Sul; SPA - Espanhol; SPA-LATAM - Espanhol (América Latina); SPA-MX - Espanhol (México); SQI - Albanês; SRP – Sérvio; SUN - Sudanês; SWA - Suaíli; SWE – Sueco; TAM - Tâmil; TEL - Telugo; TGK - Tajique; TGL – Tagalo; THA – Tailandês; TON - Tonganês; TUK - Turquemeno; TUR – Turco; UIG - Uigure; UKR – Ucraniano; URD - Urdu; UZB - Usbeque; VIE – Vietnamita; WOL - Uolofe; XHO - Xossa; YID - Ídiche; YOR - Ioruba; ZHO (simpl) - Chinês (simplificado); ZHO (tr) - Chinês (tradicional); ZUL - Zulu; Outro
en: Language version: AAR- Afar; AFR- Afrikaans; AKA- Akan; AMH- Amharic; ARA- Arabic; ARA-EG- Arabic (Egypt); ARA-GUL- Arabic (Gulf); ARA-IQ- Arabic (Iraq); ARA-LEV- Arabic (Levantine); ARA-MAG- Arabic (Maghrebi); ARA-SUD- Arabic (Sudanese); ASM- Assamese; AYM- Aymara; AZE- Azerbaijani; BEL- Belarusian; BEN- Bengali; BOD- Tibetan; BOS- Bosnian; BRA- Brazilian Portuguese; BRE- Breton; BUL- Bulgarian; CAT- Catalan; CES- Czech; CRO- Croatian; CYM- Welsh; DAN- Danish; DEU- German; DEU-BE- German (Belgium); DEU-CH- German (Switzerland); ELL- Greek; ENG- English; ENG-AU- English (Australia); ENG-CA- English (Canada); ENG-GB- English (United Kingdom); ENG-HK- English (Hong Kong); ENG-IN- English (India); ENG-NZ- English (New Zealand); ENG-SG- English (Singapore); ENG-US- English (United States); ENG-ZA- English (South Africa); EPO- Esperanto; EST- Estonian; EUS- Basque; EWE- Ewe; FAO- Faroese; FAS- Farsi; FAS- Persian; FIL- Filipino; FIN- Finnish; FRA- French; FRA-BE- French (Belgium); FRA-CA- French (Canada); FRA-CH- French (Switzerland); GLE- Irish; GLG- Galician; GRC- Ancient Greek; GRN- Guarani; GSW- Swiss German; GUJ- Gujarati; HAU- Hausa; HEB- Hebrew; HIN- Hindi; HRV- Croatian; HUN- Hungarian; HYE- Armenian; IBO- Igbo; INC- Indonesian; IND- Indonesian; IRA- Iranian; ISL- Icelandic; ITA- Italian; JAV- Javanese; JPN- Japanese; KAL- Greenlandic; KAN- Kannada; KAT- Georgian; KAZ- Kazakh; KHM- Khmer; KIN- Kinyarwanda; KIR- Kirghiz; KOR- Korean; KUR- Kurdish; LAO- Lao; LAT- Latin; LAV- Latvian; LIN- Lingala; LIT- Lithuanian; LTZ- Luxembourgish; MAL- Malayalam; MAR- Marathi; MDR- Mandar; MKD- Macedonian; MLG- Malagasy; MLT- Maltese; MON- Mongolian; MRI- Maori; MSA- Malay; MYA- Burmese; Multilingual- multilingual (not specific to one language); NAV- Navajo; NEP- Nepali; NLD- Dutch; NLD-BE- Dutch (Belgium); NNO- Norwegian (Nynorsk); NOB- Norwegian (Bokmål); NOR- Norwegian; NYA- Chichewa; ORM- Oromo; PAN- Punjabi; POL- Polish; POR- Portuguese; POR-BR- Portuguese (Brazil); PUS- Pashto; QUE- Quechua; ROH- Romansh; RON- Romanian; RUS- Russian; SCR- Croatian; SLK- Slovak; SLV- Slovenian; SME- Northern Sámi; SMO- Samoan; SOM- Somali; SOT- Southern Sotho; SPA- Spanish; SPA-LATAM- Spanish (Latin American); SPA-MX- Spanish (Mexico); SQI- Albanian; SRP- Serbian; SUN- Sundanese; SWA- Swahili; SWE- Swedish; TAM- Tamil; TEL- Telugu; TGK- Tajik; TGL- Tagalog; THA- Thai; TON- Tongan; TUK- Turkmen; TUR- Turkish; UIG- Uyghur; UKR- Ukrainian; URD- Urdu; UZB- Uzbek; VIE- Vietnamese; WOL- Wolof; XHO- Xhosa; YID- Yiddish; YOR- Yoruba; ZHO (simpl)- Chinese (simplified); ZHO (tr)- Chinese (traditional); ZUL- Zulu; Other
ko: 언어 버전: AAR- 아파르; AFR- 아프리칸스어; AKA- 아칸; AMH- 암하라어; ARA- 아랍어; ARA-EG- 아랍어(이집트); ARA-GUL- 아랍어(걸프); ARA-IQ- 아랍어(이라크); ARA-LEV- 아랍어(레반트); ARA-MAG- 아랍어(마그레브어); ARA-SUD- 아랍어(수단어); ASM- 아삼어; AYM- 아이마라어; AZE- 아제르바이잔어; BEL- 벨로루시어; BEN- 벵골어; BOD- 티베트어; BOS- 보스니아어; BRA- 브라질 포르투갈어; BRE- 브르타뉴어; BUL- 불가리아어; CAT- 카탈로니아어; CES- 체코어; CRO- 크로아티아어; CYM- 웨일스어; DAN- 덴마크어; DEU- 독일어; DEU-BE- 독일어(벨기에); DEU-CH- 독일어(스위스); ELL- 그리스어; ENG- 영어; ENG-AU- 영어(호주); ENG-CA- 영어(캐나다); ENG-GB- 영어(영국); ENG-HK- 영어(홍콩); ENG-IN- 영어(인도); ENG-NZ- 영어(뉴질랜드); ENG-SG- 영어(싱가포르); ENG-US- 영어(미국); ENG-ZA- 영어(남아프리카); EPO- 에스페란토어; EST- 에스토니아어; EUS- 바스크어; EWE- 에웨어; FAO- 페로어; FAS- 파르시어; FAS- 페르시아어; PIL- 필리핀어; FIN- 핀란드어; FRA- 프랑스어; FRA-BE- 프랑스어(벨기에); FRA-CA- 프랑스어(캐나다); FRA-CH- 프랑스어(스위스); GLE- 아일랜드어; GLG- 갈리시아어; GRC- 고대 그리스어; GRN- 과라니어; GSW- 스위스 독일어; GUJ- 구자라트어; HAU- 하우사어; HEB- 히브리어; HIN- 힌디어; HRV- 크로아티아어; HUN- 헝가리어; HYE- 아르메니아어; IBO- 이그보어; INC- 인도네시아어; IND- 인도네시아어; IRA- 이란어; ICE- 아이슬란드어; ITA- 이탈리아어; JAV- 자바어; JPN- 일본어; KAL- 그린란드어; KAN- 칸나다어; GEO- 그루지야어; KAZ- 카자흐어; KHM- 크메르어; KIN- 키냐르완다어; KIR- 키르기스스탄어; KOR- 한국어; KUR- 쿠르드어; LAO- 라오어; LAT- 라틴어; LAV- 라트비아어; LIN- 링갈라어; LIT- 리투아니아어; LTZ- 룩셈부르크어; MAL- 말레이어; MAR- 마라티어; MDR- 만다르어; MKD- 마케도니아어; MLG- 마다가스카르어; MLT- 몰타어; MON- 몽골어; MRI- 마오리어; MSA- 말레이어; MYA- 버마어; 다국어- 다국어(한 언어에만 국한되지 않음); NAV- 나바호어; NEP- 네팔어; NLD- 네덜란드어; NLD-BE- 네덜란드어(벨기에); NNO- 노르웨이어(뉘노르스크); NOB- 노르웨이어(보크몰); NOR- 노르웨이어; NYA- 치체와; ORM- 오로모; PAN- 펀자브어; POL- 폴란드어; POR- 포르투갈어; POR-BR- 포르투갈어(브라질); PUS- 파슈토어; QUE- 케추아어; ROH- 로만시어; RON- 루마니아어; RUS- 러시아어; SCR- 크로아티아어; SLK- 슬로바키아어; SLV- 슬로베니아어; SME- 북부 사미어; SMO- 사모아어; SOM- 소말리아어; SOT- 남부 소토어; SPA- 스페인어; SPA-LATAM- 스페인어(라틴 아메리카); SPA-MX- 스페인어(멕시코); SQI- 알바니아어; SRP- 세르비아어; SUN- 순다어; SWA- 스와힐리어; SWE- 스웨덴어; TAM- 타밀어; TEL- 텔루구어; TGK- 타지크어; TGL- 타갈로그어; THA- 태국어; TON- 통가어; TUK- 투르크멘; TUR- 튀르키예어; UIG- 위구르어; UKR- 우크라이나어; URD- 우르두어; UZB- 우즈베크어; VIE- 베트남어; WOL- 울로프어; XHO- 코사어; YID- 이디시어; YOR- 요루바어; ZHO(simpl)- 중국어(간체); ZHO(tr)- 중국어(번체); ZUL- 줄루어; 기타
ja: 言語バージョン: AAR-アファル語; AFR-アフリカーンス語; AKA-アカン語; AMH-アムハラ語; ARA-アラビア語; ARA-EG-アラビア語（エジプト）; ARA-GUL-アラビア語（湾岸）; ARA-IQ-アラビア語（イラク）; ARA-LEV-アラビア語（レバノン）; ARA-MAG-アラビア語（マグリブ）; ARA-SUD-アラビア語（スーダン）; ASM-アッサム語; AYM-アイマラ語; AZE-アゼルバイジャン語; BEL-ベラルーシ語; BEN-ベンガル語; BOD-チベット語; BOS-ボスニア語; BRA-ブラジルポルトガル語; BRE-ブルトン語; BUL-ブルガリア語; CAT-カタルーニャ語; CES-チェコ語; CRO-クロアチア語; CYM-ウェール語; DAN-デンマーク語; DEU-ドイツ語; DEU-BE-ドイツ語 (ベルギー); DEU-CH-ドイツ語 (スイス); ELL-ギリシャ語; ENG-英語; ENG-AU-英語（オーストラリア）; ENG-CA-英語（カナダ）; ENG-GB-英語（イギリス）; ENG-HK-英語（香港）; ENG-IN-英語 (インド); ENG-NZ-英語（ニュージーランド）; ENG-SG-英語 (シンガポール); ENG-US-英語 (米国); ENG-ZA-英語（南アフリカ）; EPO-エスペラント語; EST-エストニア語; EUS-バスク語; EWE-エウェ語; FAO-フェロー語; FAS-ペルシア語; FAS-ペルシャ語; FIL-フィリピン語; FIN-フィンランド語; FRA-フランス語; FRA-BE-フランス語（ベルギー）; FRA-CA-フランス語（カナダ）; FRA-CH-フランス語（スイス）; GLE-ゲール語; GLG-ガリシア語; GRC-古代ギリシャ語; GRN-グアラニ語; GSW-スイスドイツ語; GUJ-グアラニー語; HAU-ハウサ語; HEB-ヘブライ語; HIN-ヒンディー語; HRV-クロアチア語; HUN-ハンガリー語; HYE-アルメニア語; IBO-イボ語; INC-インドネシア語; IND-インドネシア語; IRA-イラン語; ISL-アイスランド語; ITA-イタリア語; JAV-ジャワ語; JPN-日本語; KAL-グリーンランド語; KAN-カンナダ語; KAT-グルジア語; KAZ-カザフ語; KHM-クメール語; KIN-ルワンダ語; KIR-キルギス語; KOR-韓国語; KUR-クルド語; LAO-ラオス語; LAT-ラテン語; LAV-ラトビア語; LIN-リンガラ語; LIT-リトアニア語; LTZ-ルクセンブルグ語; MAL-マラヤーラム語; MAR-マラーティー語; MDR-マンダール語; MKD-マケドニア語; MLG-マダガスカル語; MLT-マルタ語; MON-モンゴル語; MRI-マオリ語; MSA-マレー語; MYA-ビルマ語; 多言語 (特定の言語に限定されない); NAV-ナバホ語; NEP-ネパール語; NLD-オランダ語; NLD-BE-オランダ語（ベルギー）; NNO-ノルウェー語（ニーノシュク）; NNO-ノルウェー語（ブークモール）; NOR-ノルウェー語; NYA-チェワ語; ORM-オロモ語; PAN-パンジャーブ語; POL-ポーランド語; POR-ポルトガル語; POR-BR-ポルトガル語（ブラジル）; PUS-パシュトー語; QUE-ケチュア語; ROH-ロマンシュ語; RON-ルーマニア語; RUS-ロシア語; SCR-クロアチア語; SLK-スロバキア語; SLV-スロベニア語; SME-北部サーミ語; SMO-サモア語; SOM-ソマリ語; SOT-南ソト語; SPA-スペイン語; SPA-LATAM-スペイン語（ラテン・アメリカ）; SPA-MX-スペイン語（メキシコ）; SQI-アルバニア語; SRP-セルビア語; SUN-スンダ語; SWA-スワヒリ語; SWE-スウェーデン語; TAM-タミル語; TEL-テルグ語; TGK-タジク語; TGL-タガログ語; THA-タイ語; TON-トンガ語; TUK-トルクメン語; TUR-トルコ語; UIG-ウイグル語; UKR-ウクライナ語; URD-ウルドゥー語; UZB-ウズベク語; VIE-ベトナム語; WOL-ウォロフ語; XHO-コサ語; YID-イディッシュ語; YOR-ヨルバ語; ZHO(simpl)-中国語（簡体字）; ZHO(tr)-中国語（繁体字）; ZUL-ズールー語; その他
fr: Version linguistique: AAR - Afar; AFR - Afrikaans; AKA - Akan; AMH - Amharique; ARA - Arabe; ARA - EG - Arabe (Égypte); ARA - GUL - Arabe (Golfe Persique); ARA - IQ - Arabe (Iraq); ARA - LEV - Arabe (Levant); ARA - MAG - Arabe (Maghreb); ARA - SUD - Arabe (Soudan); ASM - Assamais; AYM - Aymara; AZE - Azerbaïdjanais; BEL - Biélorusse; BEN - Bengali; BOD - Tibétain; BOS - Bosniaque; BRA - Portugais brésilien; BRE - Breton; BUL - Bulgare; CAT - Catalan; CES - Tchèque; CRO - Croate; CYM - Gallois; DAN - Danois; DEU - Allemand; DEU-BE - Allemand (Belgique); DEU-CH - Allemand (Suisse); ELL - Grec; ENG- Anglais; ENG - AU - Anglais (Australie); ENG - CA - Anglais (Canada); ENG - GB - Anglais (Royaume-Uni); ENG - HK - Anglais (Hong Kong); ENG-IN- Anglais (Inde); ENG - NZ - Anglais (Nouvelle-Zélande); ENG-SG- Anglais (Singapour); ENG-US – Anglais (États-Unis); ENG - ZA - Anglais (Afrique du Sud); EPO- Espéranto; EST- estonien; EUS - Basque; EWE - Éwé; FAO - Féroïen; SAF - Farsi; FAS - Persan; FIL - Filipino; FIN- finnois; FRA - Français; FRA-BE - Français (Belgique); FRA-CA - Français (Canada); FRA-CH - Français (Suisse); GLE - Irlandais; GLG - Galicien; GRC - Grec ancien; GRN - Guarani; GSW - Suisse Allemand; GUJ - Gujarati; HAU - Haoussa; HEB- Hébreu; HIN - hindi; HRV - croate; HUN- Hongrois; HYE - Arménien; IBO - Igbo; INC - Indonésien; IND- indonésien; IRA - Iranien; ISL - Islandais; ITA - Italien; JAV - Javanais; JPN-Japonais; KAL - Groenlandais; KAN - Kannada; KAT - Géorgien; KAZ - Kazakh; KHM - Khmer; KIN - Kinyarwanda; KIR - Kirghiz; KOR - coréen; KUR- Kurde; LAO - Lao; LAT- Latin; LAV- letton; LIN - Lingala; LIT- lituanien; LTZ - Luxembourgeois; MAL - Malayalam; MAR - Marathi; MDR- Mandar; MKD - Macédonien; MLG - Malgache; MLT - Maltais; MON- mongol; MRI - Maori; MSA - Malais; MYA - Birman; Multilingue- multilingue (non spécifique à une langue); NAV - Navajo; NEP - Népalais; NLD - Néerlandais; NLD-BE - Néerlandais (Belgique); NNO - Norvégien (Nynorsk); NOB - Norvégien (Bokmål); NOR- Norvégien; NYA - Chichewa; ORM - Oromo; PAN - Pendjabi; POL - Polonais; POR- Portugais; POR-BR - Portugais (Brésil); PUS - Pachto; QUE - Quechua; ROH- romanche; RON - Roumain; RUS- Russe; SCR- croate; SLK- Slovaque; SLV- slovène; SME - Same du Nord; SMO - Samoan; SOM - Somali; SOT - Sotho du Sud; SPA - Espagnol; SPA-LATAM - Espagnol (Amérique latine); SPA-MX - Espagnol (Mexique); SQI - Albanais; SRP - Serbe; SUN - Soundanais; SWA - Swahili; SWE- Suédois; TAM - Tamoul; TEL - Telugu; TGK - Tadjik; TGL- Tagalog; THA- Thaï; TON - Tongien; TUK - Turkmène; TUR-turc; UIG - Ouïghour; UKR - Ukrainien; URD - Ourdou; UZB - Ouzbek; VIE- Vietnamien; WOL - Wolof; XHO - Xhosa; YID - Yiddish; YOR - Yoruba; ZHO-SIMPL - Chinois (simplifié); ZHO-TR - Chinois (traditionnel); ZUL - Zoulou; Autre
hu: Nyelvi változat: AAR – afar; AFR – afrikaans; AKA – akan; AMH – amhara; ARA – arab; ARA-EG – arab (Egyiptom); ARA-GUL – arab (Öböl); ARA-IQ – arab (Irak); ARA-LEV – arab (levantei); ARA-MAG – arab (maghrebi); ARA-SUD – arab (szudáni); ASM – asszámi; AYM – Aymara; AZE – azerbajdzsáni; BEL – belarusz; BEN – bengáli; BOD – tibeti; BOS – bosnyák; BRA – brazil portugál; BRE – breton; BUL – bolgár; CAT – katalán; CES – cseh; CRO – horvát; CYM – walesi; DAN – dán; DEU – német; DEU-BE – német (Belgium); DEU-CH – német (Svájc); ELL – görög; ENG – angol; ENG-AU – angol (Ausztrália); ENG-CA – angol (Kanada); ENG-GB – angol (Egyesült Királyság); ENG-HK – angol (Hongkong); ENG-IN – angol (India); ENG-NZ – angol (Új-Zéland); ENG-SG – angol (Szingapúr); ENG-US – angol (Egyesült Államok); ENG-ZA – angol (Dél-Afrika); EPO – eszperantó; EST – észt; EUS – baszk; EWE – ewe; FAO – feröeri; FAS – fárszi; FAS – perzsa; FIL – filippínó; FIN – finn; FRA – francia; FRA-BE – francia (Belgium); FRA-CA – francia (Kanada); FRA-CH – francia (Svájc); GLE – ír; GLG – galíciai; GRC – ógörög; GRN – guarani; GSW – svájci német; GUJ – gudzsaráti; HAU – hausza; HEB – héber; HIN – hindi; HRV – horvát; HUN – magyar; HYE – örmény; IBO – igbo; INC – indonéz; IND – indonéz; IRA – iráni; ISL – izlandi; ITA – olasz; JAV – jávai; JPN – japán; KAL – grönlandi; KAN – kannada; KAT – grúz; KAZ – kazah; KHM – khmer; KIN – ruandai; KIR – kirgiz; KOR – koreai; KUR – kurd; LAO – lao; LAT – latin; LAV – lett; LIN – lingala; LIT – litván; LTZ – luxemburgi; MAL – malajálam; MAR – maráthi; MDR – mandar; MKD – macedón; MLG – madagaszkári; MLT – máltai; MON – mongol; MRI – maori; MSA – maláj; MYA – burmai; Többnyelvű – többnyelvű (nem csak egy nyelvre jellemző); NAV – navahó; NEP – nepáli; NLD – holland; NLD-BE – holland (Belgium); NNO – norvég (nynorsk); NOB – norvég (bokmål); NOR – norvég; NYA – cseva; ORM  – oromo; PAN – pandzsábi; POL – lengyel; POR – portugál; POR-BR – portugál (Brazília); PUS – pastu; QUE – kecsua; ROH – rétoromán; RON – román; RUS – orosz; SCR – horvát; SLK – szlovák; SLV – szlovén; SME – északi számi; SMO – szamoai; SOM – szomáli; SOT – déli szotho; SPA – spanyol; SPA-LATAM – spanyol (Latin-Amerika); SPA-MX – spanyol (Mexikó); SQI – albán; SRP – szerb; SUN – szundai; SWA – szuahéli; SWE – svéd; TAM – tamil; TEL – telugu; TGK – tádzsik; TGL – tagalog; THA – thai; TON – tongai; TUK – türkmén; TUR – török; UIG – ujgur; UKR – ukrán; URD – urdu; UZB – üzbég; VIE – vietnámi; WOL – wolof; XHO – xhosza; YID – jiddis; YOR – joruba; ZHO (egysz.) – kínai (egyszerűsített); ZHO (hagy.) – kínai (hagyományos); ZUL – zulu; Egyéb